Privacy Statement
Phantasialand Schmidt-Löffelhardt GmbH & Co. KG
Berggeiststraße 31–41, D - 50321 Brühl, Germany
Phantasialand Verwaltungsgesellschaft mbH
Berggeiststraße 31–41, D - 50321 Brühl, Germany
Phantasialand Gastronomie GmbH
Berggeiststraße 31–41, D - 50321 Brühl, Germany
This privacy statement explains the nature, scope and purpose of the processing of personal data (hereinafter referred to as “data”) within our online service and its related websites, functions and content, as well as external online presence, such as our social media profile (hereinafter collectively referred to as “online service”). With regard to the terms used, such as “processing” or “controller”, we refer to the definitions in Article 4 of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
Scope of application
The following information refers to and applies to the domains and mobile applications listed below.
Our websites (online presences) include the domains:
www.phantasialand.de
and associated subdomains, for example
immersion-phantasialand.de
and
shop.phantasialand.de
Our mobile applications include:
https://itunes.apple.com/de/app/phantasialand/id1320768629?mt=8
(iTunes)
https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=de.phantasialand
(PlayStore)
Types of data processed:
Inventory data (e.g., names, addresses).
Contact details (e.g., e-mail, telephone numbers).
Content data (e.g., text input, photographs, videos).
Usage data (e.g., visited websites, interest in content, access times).
Meta/communication data (e.g., device information, IP addresses).
Categories of persons concerned
Visitors and users of the online service (hereinafter referred to as "users").
Purpose of processing
Provision of the online service, its functions and contents.
Answer contact requests and communicate with users.
Security measures.
Coverage/marketing
Terms used
"Personal data" means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (hereinafter referred to as "data subject"); an identifiable natural person is a person who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by assignment to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier (e.g. cookie) or to one or more special features that express the physical, physiological, genetic, psychological, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person.
"Processing" means any operation or series of operations in connection with personal data carried out with or without the aid of automated procedures. The term has a very broad meaning and covers practically every type of data handling.
"Pseudonymisation" means the processing of personal data in such a manner that the personal data can no longer be attributed to a specific data subject without the use of additional information, provided that this additional information is kept separately and is subject to technical and organisational measures to ensure that personal data is not attributed to an identified or identifiable natural person.
"Profiling" means any automated processing of personal data where the purpose is the use of such personal data to evaluate certain personal aspects relating to a natural person, in particular to analyse or predict aspects relating to the work performance, economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behaviour, location or relocation of that natural person.
“Controller " means the natural or legal person, authority, institution or other body that alone or together with others decides on the purposes and means of processing personal data.
"Processor" means a natural or legal person, authority, institution or other body processing personal data on behalf of the controller.
Applicable legal bases
The following gives information on the legal basis of our data processing activities in accordance with Art. 13 GDPR. If the legal basis is not mentioned in the privacy statement, the following applies: The legal basis for obtaining consent is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a and Art. 7 GDPR, the legal basis for processing for the performance of our services and performance of contractual measures as well as for answering inquiries is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b GDPR, the legal basis for processing to fulfil our legal obligations is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. c GDPR, and the legal basis for processing to protect our legitimate interests is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f DSGVO. Art. 6 para 1 lit. d GDPR serves as the legal basis in the event that the vital interests of the data subject or another natural person require the processing of personal data.
Security measures
We take appropriate technical and organisational measures to ensure a level of protection appropriate to the risk, taking into account the state of the art, implementation costs and the nature, scope, circumstances and purposes of processing as well as the different probability of occurrence and severity of the risk to the rights and freedoms of natural persons, in accordance with Art. 32 GDPR.
These measures include, in particular, ensuring the confidentiality, integrity and availability of data by controlling physical access to the data, as well as the access, input, transmission, security of availability and its separation. We have also established procedures to ensure the exercise of data subject rights, deletion of data and reaction to endangerment of data. We already consider the protection of personal data during the development or selection of hardware, software and procedures, in accordance with the principle of data protection through technology design and data protection-friendly presetting (Art. 25 GDPR).
Collaboration with contract processors and third parties
If we disclose data to other persons and companies (contract processors or third parties) within the context of our processing, transmit it to them or otherwise grant them access to the data, this shall only take place on the basis of a legal permission (e.g. if transmission of the data to third parties, such as payment service providers, in accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. b GDPR is necessary for contract  fulfilment), to which you have given your consent, if there is a legal obligation to do so or on the basis of our legitimate interests (e.g. when using agents, web hosts, etc.).
If we commission third parties with the processing of data on the basis of what is referred to as an "order processing contract", this is performed on the basis of Art. 28 GDPR.
Transfers to third countries
If we process data in a third country (i.e. outside the European Union (EU) or the European Economic Area (EEA)) or if this occurs in the context of the use of third-party services or disclosure or transfer of data to third parties, this only takes place if it occurs for the fulfilment of our (pre)contractual obligations, on the basis of your consent, on the basis of a legal obligation or on the basis of our legitimate interests. Subject to legal or contractual permissions, we process or have the data processed in a third country only if the special requirements of Art. 44 ff. GDPR apply. This means, for example, that processing is performed on the basis of special guarantees, such as the officially recognised level of a data protection corresponding to the EU (e.g. for the USA by the "Privacy Shield") or compliance with officially recognised special contractual obligations (referred to as  "standard contractual clauses").
Rights of data subjects
In accordance with Art. 15 GDPR you have the right to request confirmation whether the data concerned is being processed and to request information about this data as well as further information and a copy of the data.
In accordance with Art. 16 of the GDPR, you have the right to request the completion of data concerning you or the correction of inaccurate data concerning you.
In accordance with Art. 17 GDPR, you have the right to demand that relevant data be deleted immediately or, alternatively, to demand a restriction on the processing of the data in accordance with Art. 18 GDPR.
In accordance with Art. 20 GDPR you have the right to request to be provided with the data concerning you that you have provided to us and to request its transmission to other responsible persons.
In accordance with Art. 77 GDPR you also have the right to file a complaint with the competent supervisory authority.
Right of revocation
You have the right to revoke consents granted in accordance with Art. 7 para. 3 GDPR with effect for the future.
Right of objection
You can object to the future processing of the data concerning you at any time in accordance with Art. 21 GDPR. The objection may be lodged in particular against processing for direct marketing purposes.
Cookies and right of objection in direct advertising
"Cookies" are small files that are stored on the user's computer. Various information can be stored within the cookies. A cookie is primarily used to store information about a user (or the device on which the cookie is stored) during or after their visit to an online service. Temporary cookies, or "session cookies" or "transient cookies", are cookies that are deleted after a user leaves an online service and closes their browser. For example, the content of a shopping basket in an online shop or a login status can be stored in such a cookie. Cookies are referred to as "permanent" or "persistent" if they remain stored even after the browser is closed. For example, the login status can be saved if users visit it after several days. Likewise, the users interests may be stored in such a cookie and used for coverage or marketing purposes. "Third-party cookies" are cookies that are offered by providers other than the controller for operating the online service (otherwise, if they are only cookies offered by the controller for operating the online service, they are referred to as "first-party cookies").
We may use temporary and permanent cookies and clarify this as part of our privacy statement.
If users do not want cookies to be stored on their computer, they are asked to deactivate the option in the system settings of their browser. Stored cookies can be deleted in the browser’s system settings. The exclusion of cookies can lead to functional restrictions with this online service.
A general objection to the use of cookies used for online marketing purposes can be found in a large number of services, particularly in the case of tracking, via the US site
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
or the EU site
http://www.youronlinechoices.com/
. Furthermore, the storage of cookies can be blocked by deactivating them in the browser settings. Please note that in this case not all of the functions of this online service can be used.
Deletion of data
The data processed by us will be deleted or their processing restricted in accordance with Art. 17 and 18 GDPR. Unless expressly stated in this privacy statement, the data stored by us will be deleted as soon as it is no longer required for its intended purpose and the deletion does not conflict with any statutory retention obligations. If data are not deleted because it is necessary for other and legally permissible purposes, its processing is restricted. This means that the data is blocked and not processed for other purposes. This applies, for example, to data that must be retained for commercial or tax reasons.
According to German legal requirements, the retention period is 10 years in accordance with §§ 147 para. 1 AO, 257 para. 1 no. 1 and 4, para. 4 HGB (books, records, management reports, accounting documents, trading books, documents relevant for taxation, etc.) and 6 years in accordance with § 257 para. 1 no. 2 and 3, para. 4 HGB (commercial letters).
Business-related processing
We also process
- Contract data (for example, object of the contract, term, customer category).
- Payment data (e.g., bank details, payment history)
from our customers, interested parties and business partners for the purpose of providing contractual services, service and customer care, marketing, advertising and market research.
Order processing in the online shop and customer account
We process our customer’s data as part of the order processes in our online shop to enable them to select and order the selected products and services, as well as to execute their payment and delivery.
The processed data includes inventory data, communication data, contract data, payment data and the persons affected by the processing include our customers, interested parties and other business partners. The processing takes place for the purpose of providing contractual services in the context of operating an online shop, billing, delivery and customer services. We use session cookies for storing the contents of the shopping cart and permanent cookies for storing the login status.
Processing is carried out on the basis of Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. b (execution of order processes) and c (legally required archiving) GDPR. The information marked as necessary is required to establish and fulfil the contract. We disclose the data to third parties only within the context of delivery, payment or within the context of legal permits and obligations to legal advisors and authorities. The data will only be processed in third countries if this is necessary for the fulfilment of the contract (e.g. at the customer's request upon delivery or payment).
Users have the option of creating a user account in which they can see their orders. During the registration process the users are informed of the required mandatory information.  The user accounts are not public and cannot be indexed by search engines. If users have terminated their user account, their data with regards to the user account is deleted, unless retention is necessary for commercial or tax reasons according to Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. c GDPR. Data in the customer’s account is retained up to its deletion unless archived in the case of a legal obligation. It is the user's responsibility to save their data before the end of the contract if they have given notice of termination.
When registering at each login and using our online services we store the IP address and the time of the particular user action. The data is stored on the basis of our legitimate interests as well as the user's protection against misuse and other unauthorized use. This data is not passed to third parties unless it is necessary for the pursuit of our claims or there is a legal obligation to do so according to Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. c GDPR.
The data is deleted after the expiry of statutory warranty and comparable obligations, the requirement to retain the data is reviewed every three years; in the case of statutory archiving obligations, deletion takes place after their expiry (end of commercial law (6 years) and tax law (10 years) retention obligation).
External payment service providers
We use external payment service providers through whose platforms the users and we can carry out payment transactions (e.g., each with a link to the privacy statement)
Paypal (https://www.paypal.com/de/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full),
Visa (https://www.visa.de/datenschutz),
Mastercard (https://www.mastercard.de/de-de/datenschutz.html),
American Express (https://www.americanexpress.com/de/content/privacy-policy-statement.html)
As part of the fulfilment of contracts we employ payment service providers on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b. GDPR. We also employ external payment service providers on the basis of our legitimate interests in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b. GDPR to provide our users with effective and secure payment options.
The data processed by the payment service providers includes inventory data such as name and address, bank data such as account numbers or credit card numbers, passwords, TANs and checksums as well as contract, total sums and recipient information. This information is required to execute the transactions. However, the data entered will only be processed and stored by the payment service providers. This means that we do not receive any account or credit card related information, but only information with confirmation or negative information about the payment. The data may be transferred by the payment service providers to credit agencies. The purpose of this transmission is to verify identity and creditworthiness. For this we refer to the terms and conditions and data protection information of the payment service providers.
Applicable for payment transactions are the terms and conditions and the data protection information of the respective payment service providers, which can be accessed within the respective websites or transaction applications. We refer to these also for the purpose of further information and assertion of rights of revocation, information and other interested parties.
Administration, financial accounting, office organisation, contact management
We process data in the context of administrative tasks as well as the organisation of our company, financial accounting and compliance with legal obligations, e.g. archiving. We process the same data that we process in the course of providing our contractual services. The processing bases are Art. 6 para. 1 lit. c. GDPR, Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f. GDPR. Customers, prospects, business partners and website visitors are affected by the processing. The purpose and our interest in the processing lies in the administration, financial accounting, office organisation, archiving of data; therefore tasks which serve the maintenance of our business activities, perception of our tasks and provision of our services. The deletion of the data with regard to contractual services and contractual communication is the same as the information provided in these processing activities.
We disclose or transmit data to the tax authorities, consultants, such as tax consultants or auditors, as well as other fee offices and payment service providers.
We also store information on suppliers, event organisers and other business partners on the basis of our business interests, e.g. for the purpose of making contact at a later date. We store this data, which is mainly company-related, permanently.
Business analyses and market research
In order to operate our business economically, to be able to recognize market tendencies, wishes of the contracting parties and users, we analyse the data available to us on business processes, contracts, inquiries, etc. We process inventory data, communication data, contract data, payment data, usage data, metadata on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f. GDPR, whereby the data subjects include contractual partners, interested parties, customers, visitors and users of our online service.
The analyses are carried out for the purpose of economic evaluations, marketing and market research. We can take into account the profiles of registered users with information, e.g. on the services they have used. The analyses is used to increase the user-friendliness, the optimisation of our offer and the economic efficiency. We alone use analyses and they are not disclosed externally, unless they are anonymous analyses with summarised values.
If these analyses or profiles are personal, they will be deleted or made anonymous upon the user’s termination, otherwise after two years from the conclusion of the contract. Overall economic analyses and general trend determinations are prepared anonymously wherever possible.
Registration function
Users can create a user account in our online shop (
shop.phantasialand.de
). During the registration process the users are informed of the required mandatory information which is processed on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b GDPR for the purpose of providing the user account. The processed data includes in particular the login information (name, password and an e-mail address). The data entered during registration is used for using the user account and its purpose.
Users can be notified by e-mail of information relevant to their user account such as technical changes. If users cancel their user account, their data relating to the user account is deleted, subject to a legal obligation to retain data. It is the user's responsibility to save their data before the end of the contract if they have given notice of termination. We are entitled to irretrievably delete all user data stored during the term of the contract.
As part of the use of our registration and login functions and using our online services we store the IP address and the time of the particular user action. The data is stored on the basis of our legitimate interests as well as the user's protection against misuse and other unauthorized use. This data is not passed to third parties unless it is necessary for the pursuit of our claims or there is a legal obligation to do so according to Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. c GDPR. The IP addresses are anonymized or deleted after 7 days at the latest.
Making contact
When contacting us (using the contact form, e-mail, telephone or social media), the user's details are used for handling the contact enquiry and its processing in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR. User information can be stored in a customer relationship management system ("CRM system") or comparable enquiry organisation.
We delete the enquiries as soon as they are no longer required. We review this requirement every two years; the statutory archiving obligations also apply.
Newsletter
The following information is to notify you regarding the contents of our newsletter and the registration, dispatch and statistical evaluation procedure and your rights of objection. By subscribing to our newsletter you agree to its receipt and the procedures described.
Contents of the newsletter: We will only send newsletters, e-mails and other electronic notifications containing advertising information (hereinafter "newsletters") with the consent of the recipients or a legal permission. If the contents of a newsletter are specifically described as part of a registration, they are deemed to have the consent of the user. Our newsletters also contain information about our services and us.
Double opt-in and logging: The registration for our newsletter uses procedure referred to as a double opt-in procedure. This means that after registration you will receive an e-mail asking you to confirm your registration. This confirmation is necessary so that no one can register using different e-mail addresses. Subscriptions to the newsletter are logged to be able to prove the registration process in accordance with legal requirements. This includes the storage of the registration and confirmation time as well as the IP address. The changes to your data stored with the shipping service provider are also logged.
The dispatch of the newsletter and the associated performance measurement are based on the recipient's consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a, Art. 7 GDPR in conjunction with § 7 para. 2 no. 3 UWG or, if consent is not required, on the basis of our legitimate interests in direct marketing pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f. GDPR in conjunction with § 7 para. 3 UWG.
The registration procedure is logged on the basis of our legitimate interests pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR. Our interest lies in the use of a user-friendly and secure newsletter system that serves both our business interests and the expectations of users and also allows us to provide proof of consent.
Cancellation / Revocation – You can cancel the receipt of our newsletter at any time, this means to revoke your consent. Click on the following link to cancel the newsletter:
Unsubscribe to the newsletter
You will also find this link at the end of each newsletter. To protect our legitimate interests, we may store the e-mail addresses we have unsubscribed for up to three years before we delete them, in order to be able to prove a previously given consent. The processing of these data is limited to the possible defence against any claims. An application for cancellation can be made at any time, provided that the existence of previous consent is confirmed at the same time.
Newsletter – Shipping service provider
The newsletter is sent by the shipping service provider CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG, Schafjückenweg 2, 26180 Rastede, Germany. The shipping service provider’s privacy statement can be viewed under:
https://www.cleverreach.com/en/privacy-policy/
. The shipping service provider is used on the basis of our legitimate interests according to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR and an order processing contract according to Art. 28 para. 3 S. 1 GDPR.
The shipping service provider can use the recipient's data in pseudonymous form, i.e. without assignment to a user, to optimise or improve its own services, e.g. to technically optimise the dispatch and presentation of the newsletter or for statistical purposes. However, the shipping service does not use the data of our newsletter recipients in order to write to them themselves or to pass the data on to third parties.
Newsletter - Performance measurement
The newsletters contain what is referred to as a "web-beacon", i.e. a pixel-sized file which is downloaded from our server when the newsletter is opened or, if we use a shipping service provider, from their server. Within the scope of this retrieval, technical information, such as information about the browser and your system, as well as your IP address and time of retrieval are initially collected.
This information is used to technically improve the services based on the technical data or the target groups and their reading behaviour based on their retrieval locations (which can be determined using the IP address) or access times. The statistical surveys also include determining whether the newsletters are opened, when they are opened and which links are clicked. This information can be assigned to the individual newsletter recipients for technical reasons. However, it is neither our endeavour, nor, if used, that of the shipping service provider, to observe individual users. These evaluations are used more to recognise the reading habits of our users and to adapt our contents to them or to send different contents according to the interests of our users.
Hosting and e-mailing
The hosting services we use are designed to provide the following services: Infrastructure and platform services, computing capacity, storage and database services, e-mailing, security and technical maintenance services we use to operate this online service.
In this context we, or our hosting provider process inventory data, contact data, content data, contract data, usage data, metadata and communication data of customers, interested parties and visitors to this online service on the basis of our legitimate interests in an efficient and secure provision of this online service acc. to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR in connection with Art. 28 GDPR (conclusion of data processing contract).
Collection of access data and log files
We, or our hosting provider, collect the following data on the basis of our legitimate interests within the meaning of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f. GDPR, on each access to the server on which this service is located (so-called server log files). Access data includes the name of the accessed website, file, date and time of access, transferred data volume, notification of successful access, browser type and version, the user's operating system, referrer URL (the previously visited page), IP address and the requesting provider.
Logfile information is stored for security reasons (e.g. to investigate abusive or fraudulent activities) for a maximum of 30 days and then deleted.  Data whose further retention is required for evidential purposes shall be exempted from the cancellation until final clarification of the incident.
Google Tag Manager
Google Tag Manager is a solution with which we can manage website tags via an interface (and integrate Google Analytics and other Google marketing services into our online service, for example). The Tag Manager itself (which implements the tags) does not process any of the user’s personal data. With regard to the processing of users' personal data, reference is made to the following information on the Google services. Guidelines for use:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/tagmanager/use-policy.html
.
Google Analytics
Based on our legitimate interests (i.e. interest in the analysis, optimisation and economic operation of our online service within the meaning of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR), we use Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google LLC (“Google”).  Google uses cookies. The information generated by the cookie about the use of the online service by the users is usually transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there.
Google is certified under the Privacy Shield Agreement, which provides a guarantee to comply with European privacy legislation (
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active
).
Google will use this information on our behalf to evaluate the use of our online service by users, to compile reports on the activities within this online service and to provide us with further services related to the use of this online service and internet usage. In this case, pseudonymous usage profiles of the users can be created from the processed data.
We use Google Analytics only with enabled IP anonymization. This means that Google will truncate the IP address of users within Member States of the European Union or in other states party to the Agreement on the European Economic Area. Your full IP address will only be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and truncated there in exceptional cases.
The IP address submitted by the user’s browser will not be merged with other data provided by Google. Users can prevent the storage of cookies by setting their browser software accordingly; users may also prevent the collection by Google of the data generated by the cookie and related to their use of the online service and the processing of such data by Google by downloading and installing the browser plug-in available under the following link:
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
.
As an alternative to the browser plug-in or within browsers on mobile devices, please click on the following link to set an opt-out cookie that will prevent future collection by Google Analytics within this website (this opt-out cookie only works in this browser and only for this domain, if you delete your cookies in this browser, you must click this link again):
Deactivate Google Analytics
For more information about Google’s data usage, setting and objection options, please read Google’s Privacy Statement (
https://policies.google.com/technologies/ads
) as well as in the settings for the display of advertisements by Google
(https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
).
The personal data of users will be deleted or anonymized after 26 months.
Google Remarketing
The provider uses the Google Inc. ("Google") remarketing or "similar target group" function on the website. This feature enables the provider to target visitors to the website with advertising by delivering personalized, interest-based ads to visitors to the provider's website when they visit other websites on the Google Display Network. Google uses cookies to analyse website usage, which forms the basis for creating interest-based advertisements. Google stores a small file with a sequence of numbers in the website visitor’s browsers. This number is used to record visits to the website and anonymized data on the use of the website. None of the visitor’s personal data is stored to the website. If you subsequently visit another website in the Google Display Network, you will see ads that are highly likely to include previously accessed product and information areas. You can permanently deactivate the use of cookies by Google by following the following link and downloading and installing the plug-in provided:
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
. Alternatively, you can disable the use of cookies by third parties by visiting the deactivation page of the Network Advertising Initiative at (Network Advertising Initiative) under http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/ and implementing the additional opt-out information given. For more information about Google Remarketing and Google's privacy statement, please visit:
http://www.google.com/privacy/ads/
.
Google AdWords & Conversion-Tracking
We use the "Google AdWords" online advertising program and conversion tracking as part of Google AdWords. The Google Conversion Tracking is an analysis service of Google Inc. (1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; "Google"). When you click on an ad served by Google, a conversion tracking cookie is placed on your computer. These cookies lose their validity after 30 days, do not contain any personal data and are therefore not used for personal identification.
If you visit certain pages of our website and the cookie has not yet expired, Google and we can recognise that you clicked on the ad and were redirected to this page. Each Google AdWords customer receives a different cookie. This means that it is not possible to track AdWords customers via cookies on the websites.
The information collected using the conversion cookie is used to generate conversion statistics for AdWords customers who have opted for conversion tracking. Customers can see the total number of users who clicked on their ad and were redirected to a page with a conversion tracking tag. However, you will not receive any information that personally identifies users.
If you do not wish to participate in tracking, you can object to this use by preventing the installation of cookies by setting your browser software accordingly (deactivation option). They are then not included in the conversion tracking statistics. Further information and Google's privacy statement can be found at:
http://www.google.com/policies/technologies/ads/
,
http://www.google.de/policies/privacy/
However, we would like to point out that you may not be able to use all functions on our website in this case. By using this website, you are declaring that you consent to the data collected by Google being processed in the manner and for the purpose described.
Facebook-Pixel, Custom Audiences, Facebook-Conversion & Facebook Remarketing/Retargeting
To support our legitimate interests in the analysis, optimisation and economic operation of our online service the "Facebook pixel" of the social network Facebook, which is operated by Facebook Inc., 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA, or, if you are based in the EU, Facebook Ireland Ltd, 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland ("Facebook"), is used within our online service.
Facebook is certified under the Privacy Shield Agreement and thus offers a guarantee to comply with European data protection law (
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt0000000GnywAAC&status=Active
).
With the help of the Facebook pixel, Facebook is able to determine the visitors of our online service as a target group for the presentation of ads (referred to as "Facebook ads"). Therefore we use the Facebook pixel to display the Facebook ads we post only to Facebook users who have also shown an interest in our online service or who have certain features (e.g. interests in certain topics or products that are determined by the websites visited) that we transmit to Facebook (referred to as "custom audiences"). We also use the Facebook pixel to ensure that our Facebook ads meet the potential interest of users and are not a nuisance. The Facebook pixel also helps us understand the effectiveness of Facebook ads for statistical and market research purposes by showing whether users have been redirected to our website after clicking on a Facebook ad (referred to as "conversion").
Our website incorporates remarketing tags used by the social media network Facebook, 1601 South California Avenue, Palo Alto, CA 94304, USA. When you visit our website, the remarketing tag will establish a direct connection between your browser and the Facebook server. This will inform Facebook that you (along with your IP address) have visited our website. This enables Facebook to trace your visit on our website to your user account. We can use the information obtained from this process to display Facebook ads. We would like to point out that, as the operator of the website, we are not aware of the transmitted data or how it is used by Facebook. For further information on this matter, please see Facebook's privacy statement at
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
. If you do not wish your data to be recorded by Custom Audience, you can
deactivate
Custom Audiences here.
Facebook processes the data in accordance with Facebook's Data Usage Policy. General information on the display of Facebook ads is contained in Facebook's Data Usage Policy:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
. For specific information and details about the Facebook Pixel and how it works, visit the Facebook Help section:
https://www.facebook.com/business/help/651294705016616
.
You can object to the collection by the Facebook pixel and use of your data to display Facebook ads. To set what types of ads you see within Facebook, you can visit the page set up by Facebook and follow the instructions on usage-based advertising preferences:
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
. The settings are platform-independent, i.e. they are applied to all devices, such as desktop computers or mobile devices.
You may also object to the use of cookies for coverage and promotional purposes via the opt-out page of the Network Advertising Initiative  (
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/
) and additionally to the US website (
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
) or the European website  (
http://www.youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices/
).
TikTok Pixel
Within our online offers, the so called "TikTok pixel" of the social network TikTok, which is operated by TikTok Technology Limited, 10 Earlsfort Terrace, Dublin, D02 T380, Ireland ("TikTok"), is used.
On the one hand, the TikTok pixel enables TikTok to determine you as a visitor of our online offers as a target group for the presentation of ads (so called "TikTok-Ads"). Accordingly, we use the TikTok pixel to display the TikTok-Ads placed by us only to those TikTok users who have also shown an interest in our online offers or who exhibit certain characteristics (e.g. interests in certain topics or products determined on the basis of the websites visited) that we transmit to TikTok (so-called "custom audiences"). With the help of the TikTok pixel, we also want to ensure that our TikTok-Ads match the potential interest of users and are not annoying. The TikTok Pixels also help us track the effectiveness of TikTok-Ads for statistical and market research purposes by showing us whether users are redirected to our website after clicking on a TikTok ad (so called "conversion").
Privacy statement of TikTok:
The processing of data by TikTok is carried out within the framework of the
TikTok data use policy
. Accordingly, general information on the presentation of TikTok ads, in the TikTok data usage policy. For specific information and details about the TikTok pixel and its functionality, see the
TikTok help area
.
Basis:
The use of the TikTok pixel as well as the storage of "conversion cookies" is based on Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Contract data processing contract:
For the processing of data for which TikTok acts as a commissioned data processor, we have concluded a commissioned data processing agreement with TikTok, in which we oblige TikTok to protect the data of our customers and not to pass them on to third parties.
Objection:
You may object to the collection by the TikTok pixel and use of your data to display TikTok ads. You will find an opt-out option in our
cookie declaration
.
Twitter Social Plugins
Our website incorporates plugins for the social media network Twitter Inc., 795 Folsom St., Suite 600, San Francisco, CA 94107, USA. Twitter plugins (tweet buttons) are marked by a Twitter logo on our website. You will find an overview of the various tweet buttons here:
http://dev.twitter.com/
When you visit a page on our website, the plugin will establish a direct connection between your browser and the Twitter server. This will inform Twitter that you (along with your IP address) have visited our website. If you click the Twitter tweet button while you are logged into your Twitter account, you will be able to link content from our website to your Twitter profile. This enables Twitter to track your visit to our website to your user account. Even if you are not a member of Twitter, there is still a risk that Twitter will be able to obtain your IP address and store it. We are not aware of which and how much data is transmitted to Twitter and are unable to influence this. For further information on this matter, please see Twitter's privacy statement at:
http://twitter.com/privacy
If you do not want Twitter to be able to trace your visit on our website to your Twitter user account, please log out of your Twitter account before visiting our website.
Swat.io
We use swat.io to edit our social media channels. The provider is "Die Socialisten" Social Software Development GmbH Andreasgasse 6, Top 1, 1070 Vienna.
The basis for data processing is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. F GDPR. We have a legitimate interest in analysing user behaviour and optimising efficient communication, customer service and our advertising.
Playbuzz.com
The HTML codes of Playbuzz Playbuzz Ltd, 3 Aluf Kalman Magen St., Building A, 1st Floor, Tel. Aviv, 6107075 (Israel) are included on the website
www.phantasialandblog.de
. When you visit a sub-page of our website that includes such a Playbuzz HTML code, the browser connects you to Playbuzz's servers. The content of the HTML code is sent directly from Playbuzz to the browser on which the page you are viewing is based, so Playbuzz processes your data in this process. Refer to Playbuzz's privacy statement to see what data Playbuzz collects and for what purposes
www.playbuzz.com/PrivacyPolicy
. We have neither influence on their data handling processes nor are we aware of the full extent of data collection, the purposes and the storage periods.
Online presence in social media
We maintain online presences within social networks and platforms to communicate with active customers, interested parties and users and to inform them about our services. When accessing the respective networks and platforms, the terms and conditions and the data processing guidelines of their respective operators apply.
Unless otherwise stated in our privacy statement, we process the data of users who communicate with us within social networks and platforms, e.g. write articles on our websites or send us messages.
Use of Webfonts
A JavaScript code will be loaded on our website. If you have activated JavaScript in your browser and have not installed a JavaScript blocker, your browser may transmit personal data. We do not know which data is linked to the data received and for what purposes this data is used. To prevent the execution of JavaScript code altogether, you can install a JavaScript blocker (e.g. www.noscript.net).
On our site we use the following webfonts:
Google Inc., 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway Mountain View, CA 94043 USA (further information can be found in Google's privacy statement)
Revocation, right to information, right to correction, deletion and blocking
You have the right to obtain information about which personal data we have stored at any time, including the origin and recipient of your data and the purpose for which it is processed. In addition, you can obtain information about personal data or object to the use of personal data at any time or revoke your consent. Please withdraw your approval or request in writing or by email by contacting:
Phantasialand Schmidt-Löffelhardt GmbH & Co. KG
Berggeiststraße 31 – 41
D - 50321 Brühl
E-Mail:
info@phantasialand.de
You will reach our manager of privacy statement at:
Scheja & Partners GmbH & Co. KG
Advocat Jens-Martin Heidemann
Adenauerallee 136
53113 Bonn
Tel.: (+49) 0228-227 226 0
https://www.scheja-partner.de/kontakt/kontakt.html
E-Mail:
info@scheja-partner.de
Information regarding the use of personal data can be found on the corresponding section of our website and cannot be amended retrospectively.
Data acquisition for regional identification codes
Phantasialand Brühl records the regional identification code on the number plates of all arriving vehicles. It does not store the individual number plates for individual vehicles belonging to its visitors. The camera's signal is rendered anonymous by the local storage device and then immediately deleted.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.cleverreach.com/en/privacy-policy/:
Deutsch
English
Español
Français
Italiano
Nederlands
Support
Login
Login: customer
Login: affiliate
Home
>
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
Here you can find our Privacy Policy
1. General Privacy Policy
Insofar as we decide either alone or jointly with others on the purposes and means of data processing, this includes above all the obligation to inform you transparently about the nature, scope, purpose, duration and legal basis of the processing (cf. Articles 13 and 14 GDPR). With this statement (hereinafter: ” Privacy Policy “), we inform you about the manner in which your personal data is processed by us.
Definitions
Following the example of Art. 4 GDPR, this Privacy Policy is based on the following definitions:
‘personal data’ (Art. 4 No. 1 GDPR) means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (‘data subject’); an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person;
‘processing’ (Art. 4 No. 2 GDPR) means any operation or set of operations which is performed on personal data or on sets of personal data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction;
‘controller’ (Art. 4 No. 7 GDPR) means the natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal data; where the purposes and means of such processing are determined by Union or Member State law, the controller or the specific criteria for its nomination may be provided for by Union or Member State law;
‘third party’ (Art. 4 No. 10 GDPR) means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or body other than the data subject, controller, processor and persons who, under the direct authority of the controller or processor, are authorised to process personal data;
‘processor’ (Art. 4 No. 8 GDPR) means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which processes personal data on behalf of the controller;
‘consent’ (Art. 4 No. 11 GDPR) of the data subject means any freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous indication of the data subject’s wishes by which he or she, by a statement or by a clear affirmative action, signifies agreement to the processing of personal data relating to him or her;
Data Controller
CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG is responsible for the data collection and processing explained in this policy. You can find our contact data in our imprint.
Usage data & log files
When you visit our web pages, temporary so-called usage data are stored on our web server for statistical purposes as a protocol to improve the quality of our web pages. This data set contains:
The page from which the file was requested,
The file name,
The date and time of the query,
The amount of data transferred,
The access status (file transferred, file not found),
The description of the type of web browser used,
The IP address of the requesting computer, which is shortened so that a personal reference can no longer be established.
These log data are only stored anonymously. We store this log data strictly earmarked for a maximum of seven days to be able to detect, limit, and eliminate attacks on our websites. We delete these data at the end of this period. The legal basis is Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR.
Due to the use of subcontractors, data processing may also be performed outside the EU or EEA. Please note that there is a risk that authorities may access the data for security and monitoring purposes without you being informed or having a right to object. If you consent, the transfer to a third country will be based on Art. 49 (1) (a) GDPR.
2. Analysis tools and third-party tools
When you visit our website, your surfing behavior can be statistically evaluated. This is primarily done with cookies and so-called analysis programs. The analysis of your surfing behavior usually takes place anonymously – it cannot be traced back to you. You may object to this analysis or prevent it by not using certain tools. Read this privacy policy for further details.
3. Cookies
We use cookies on our websites. Cookies are small text files that are assigned to the browser you are using and stored on your hard drive by means of a characteristic string of characters, and through which certain information flows to the entity that sets the cookie. Cookies cannot execute programs or transfer viruses to your computer and therefore cannot cause any damage. They serve to make the offer as a whole more user-friendly and effective, i.e. more pleasant for you.
Cookies can contain data that make it possible to recognize the device used. In some cases, however, cookies only contain information on certain settings that cannot be related to a specific person. However, cookies cannot directly identify a user.
A distinction is made between session cookies, which are deleted as soon as you close your browser, and permanent cookies, which are stored beyond the individual session.
In terms of their function, cookies are in turn distinguished between:
Technical cookies: these are mandatory to move around the website, use basic functions and ensure the security of the website; they do not collect information about you for marketing purposes, nor do they store which web pages you have visited;
Performance cookies: these collect information about how you use our website, which pages you visit and, for example, whether errors occur during website use; they do not collect information that could identify you – all information collected is anonymous and is only used to improve our website and find out what interests our users;
Advertising Cookies, Targeting Cookies: these are used to provide the website user with tailored advertising on the website or third party offers and to measure the effectiveness of these offers; advertising and targeting cookies are stored for a maximum of 14 months;
Sharing cookies: these are used to improve the interactivity of our website with other services (e.g. social networks); Sharing cookies are stored for a maximum of 3 months.
Any use of cookies that is not strictly technically necessary constitutes data processing that is only permitted with your explicit and active consent pursuant to Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. a GDPR. This applies in particular to the use of advertising, targeting or sharing cookies. In addition, we will only share your personal data processed through cookies with third parties if you have given your express consent to do so pursuant to Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. a GDPR.
3a. Google Analytics
For the demand-oriented design of our website we create pseudonymous usage profiles with Google Analytics.
Google Analytics
use cookies that are placed on your device and we can read them. This allows us to recognize returning visitors and count them as such.
The information a cookie generates about your use of this website is usually transferred to a Google server in the United States and will be stored there. However, because we have activated IP anatomization on this website, your IP address will be shortened beforehand by Google within Member States of the European Union. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP address be transferred to a Google server in the USA and be shortened there. If the data is processed outside the EU/EEA, please note that authorities may access the data for security and monitoring purposes without you being informed or having the right to appeal. If we use providers in unsafe third countries and you give your consent, the transfer to a third country takes place based on Art. 49 para. 1 letter a GDPR.
To ensure the level of data protection in the case of processing in third countries (in particular also the USA), Google Ireland Ltd. has agreed to the standard contractual clauses with its subcontracted processors (in particular Google LLC), which are based on Module 3 of the standard contractual clauses for the transfer of personal data to third countries adopted by the European Commission on June 4, 2021 (
https://business.safety.google/adsprocessorterms/sccs/eu-p2p-intra-group/
).
The legal basis for the data processing is your consent pursuant to Art. 6 (1) a GDPR or § 25 (1) TTDSG
3b. Facebook Pixel
Our website uses the “visitor action pixel” of Meta Platforms Ireland Ltd, 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland (“Facebook”).
This way, the behavior of page visitors can be tracked after they have been forwarded to the provider’s website by clicking on a Facebook advertisement. This allows the effectiveness of Facebook advertisements to be evaluated for statistical and market research purposes and future advertising measures to be optimized.
For us as the operator of this website, the collected data is anonymous; we cannot draw any conclusions about the identity of the users.
However, the data is stored and processed by Facebook, so that a connection to the respective user profile is possible and Facebook can use the data for its own advertising purposes, in accordance with the Facebook data usage policy (
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
).
This allows Facebook to serve ads on Facebook pages and outside of Facebook.
A cookie may also be stored on your computer for this purpose. The data processed by Facebook and linked to cookies are automatically deleted after 90 days.
Please see Facebook’s privacy policy for more information about your privacy:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
.
You can also deactivate the marketing function “Custom Audiences” in the settings section for advertisements at
https://www.facebook.com/ads/preferences/?entry_product=ad_settings_screen
. You must be logged in to Facebook.
If you do not have a Facebook account, you can disable Facebook usage-based advertising on the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance website:
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices
.
The legal basis for the data processing is Art. 6 para. 1 subparagraph 1 lit. a GDPR or § 25 para. 1 TTDSG.
With your consent, you also agree pursuant to Art. 49 para. 1 p. 1a) GDPR that your data will be processed in the USA. The USA is assessed by the European Court of Justice as a country with an insufficient level of data protection according to EU standards.
In particular, there is a risk that your data may be processed by U.S. authorities for control and monitoring purposes, possibly also without any legal remedy.
3c. Retargeting Google
We use Google’s cross-device remarketing technologies to enable us to display targeted advertising on other websites based on your visit to our websites.
When you visit our websites, it is possible that Google’s Cross-Device Remarketing technologies may retrieve recognition features for your browser or your end device (e.g. create a so-called browser fingerprint), evaluate your IP address or store a recognition feature in the form of a small data file on your end device (e.g. a so-called third-party cookie).
It is also possible that Google may link and store your visit to our website with one or more of these recognition features in order to display our advertising on other pages on the Internet. The recognition features described above are designed as pseudonyms.
Due to the cross-device remarketing technologies at Google, we can commission the placement of advertisements on other websites that are based on the visits on our websites. So, if you visit another website that is part of Google’s display advertising network, Google can use the recognition features to determine alternatives, and if so, which of our ads should be displayed to you. For more information on how Google Remarketing technologies work, visit
https://www.google.com/policies/technologies/ads/
.
If you sign in to Google services with your own credentials or use one or more of your own Google accounts, Google may link the recognition features of different browsers and devices.
So, if Google has created a recognition feature for your laptop, desktop PC or smartphone or tablet, you can associate those features once you use or have used a Google service with your sign-in information. In this way, Google can also play our advertising campaigns beyond end devices in a targeted manner. However, Google will only do this if you have agreed to this data processing in the past.
You have the option of making settings for advertising. You can object to this form of advertising at any time. To do so, please visit
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/2662922
and deactivate personalized advertising. Please note that these settings may not affect all devices and browsers.
The legal basis for the data processing is Art. 6 para. 1 subparagraph 1 lit. a GDPR or § 25 para. 1 TTDSG.
3d. Google Ads, Google Ads conversion tracking and extended conversions
This website uses Google Ads. Google Ads is an online advertising service provided by Google Ireland Ltd, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (“Google”). Google is the controller.
As part of Google Ads, we use so-called conversion tracking. When you click on an ad placed by Google, a cookie is set for conversion tracking.
These cookies expire 90 days after they are created. They are not used to identify users personally. If a user visits certain pages of this website and the cookie has not yet expired, Google and we can see that the user clicked on the ad and was redirected to this page.
Each user gets a different cookie. You cannot track these cookies through the websites of users. The information collected using the conversion cookie is used to generate conversion statistics for Ads customers who have opted for conversion tracking. Customers are told the total number of users who clicked on their ad and were redirected to a page with a conversion tracking tag. However, they do not receive any information that can be used to personally identify users. If you don’t want to be tracked, you can easily turn off the Google Conversion Tracking cookie in your Internet browser settings. Then you won’t be included in the conversion tracking statistics.
Google Ads uses Google Enhanced Conversions. This helps us understand and improve the performance of our advertising campaigns. To do this, we record the email addresses (called PIs later) you enter on our pages in a hashed format. Enhanced Conversions is a feature that can improve the accuracy of conversion tracking while protecting user privacy. It supplements existing conversion tags with the hashed PIs from the website. As part of the Enhanced Conversion feature, your hashed PIs on certain pages are sent to Google.
These measures are only used if you have agreed to use this Google Enhanced Conversions feature and Google Ads Conversion Tracking in the tool settings. When we enrich the inventory data, we also use the consent you gave us. Only data from the sources you have consented to will be used.
You can find more information on how Google processes your data for advertisements in Google’s
privacy policy
and in
Google Ads Help
.
The legal basis for processing your data is your consent, in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 subpara. 1 lit. a GDPR or § 25 para. 1 TTDSG.
3e. Hotjar
This website uses the Hotjar tool of the provider Hotjar Limited (Hotjar Ltd.), Dragonara Business Centre, 5th Floor, Dragonara Road, Paceville St Julian’s STJ 3141, Malta, to analyze the use of our offers. Hotjar provides a variety of options such as heat maps, visitor recordings, funnel and form analytics, feedback polls, surveys, and recruiters (for more information, please visit
https://www.hotjar.com/
).
Hotjar is a complete analytics-and-feedback tool that provides both online behavior analytics and feedback from website visitors. By combining both A) analytics and B) feedback, Hotjar gives us a “big picture” of how to improve our website user experience and performance.
In doing so, the analytics tool allows us to monitor user behavior (what users are doing), while the feedback tool allows us to hear what users are saying (user voice). By doing so, Hotjar allows us to analyze and understand the behavior patterns of our website visitors and customers on our web presences with the help of using analytics and feedback. The sole purpose of the data collection is to improve the functionality of the website and the overall user experience of users and customers.
As part of the use of Hotjar, data may be processed such as the IP address (stored in anonymized form), screen resolution, device type (unique device identifiers), operating system, browser, geographic location (country only), language preferred to view our website, mouse movements, keystrokes, referral URL and domain, web pages visited and date and time when the web pages were visited. In order to work properly, Hotjar sets cookies in your browser.
These have different lifetimes; some remain stored for up to 365 days, some only during the current website visit (see:
https://help.hotjar.com/hc/en-us/articles/115011789248-Hotjar-Cookie-Information
).
The legal basis for the data processing is your consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 subparagraph 1 lit. a GDPR or § 25 para. 1 TTDSG.
You can revoke your consent via the banner (by clicking on “Cookie settings” in the footer) at any time. The information generated and processed by cookies and, if applicable, integrated script of the service about your use of this website is usually transmitted to a server of Hotjar in Ireland (European Union) and stored there (
https://help.hotjar.com/hc/en-us/articles/115011639887-Data-Safety-Privacy- Security#FAQ_1
).
We have also entered into a contract for commissioned processing with Hotjar Limited in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR, in which the provider undertakes to make appropriate and legally binding contractual arrangements and to take control measures to ensure data protection and data security when using subcontractors and under which data transfers to third countries take place under EU standard data protection clauses. The processor will also use all information strictly for the purpose of analyzing the use of our website and user-related behavior for us.
For more information on data protection at Hotjar, see:
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/
.
3f. Microsoft Ads
This website uses Microsoft Ads, a service provided by Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, One Microsoft Place, South County Business Park, Leopardstown, Dublin 18, Ireland.
When you click on one of our ads on Bing or on selected Bing network sites, a temporary cookie is placed on your computer. When you now reach one of our conversion pages – recognizable for Microsoft Bing and us – we know that you have previously clicked on the ad. This is used to create conversion statistics, i.e. to record how many users reach a conversion page after clicking on an ad, i.e. to complete an order process.
If you do not wish to participate in the tracking procedure, you can also refuse the setting of a cookie required for this.
The legal basis for the data processing is your consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 subparagraph 1 lit. a GDPR or § 25 para. 1 TTDSG.
3g. Social plugins
Our website contains icons of the social networks Facebook and Instagram, the Internet video portal YouTube and the microblogging service Twitter. These services are provided by the companies Meta Platforms Ireland Ltd. (“Facebook” and “Instagram”); Google Ireland Limited (“YouTube”) and Twitter International Company. Inc. (“Twitter”) and each have their own privacy regulations.
This gives you the opportunity to share the posts deposited on our website on the aforementioned platforms. These are not plugins, but merely links that forward to the respective provider to share posts there.
Normally, these social plugins lead to the fact that every visitor to a page is immediately recorded by these services with his IP address and his further activities on the Internet are logged. This happens even if the user does not click on any of the buttons.
To prevent this, we use the Shariff method. Our social buttons establish direct contact between the social network and the visitor only when the latter actively clicks on the button.
By clicking on the corresponding icon, the respective target page opens in a separate tab/window and you must then log in there with your data. In doing so, you will leave our website and your data will be processed by these services in accordance with their privacy protection regulations. Information on the page of origin (so-called referrer data) is transferred to the target page so that the content or posts can be displayed there.
For further information and technical details on the Shariff solution, please visit:
Initiative of heise.de for a 2-click method called “Shariff”.
For more information on data processing on the provider pages, please refer to the data protection notices of the operators.
Data protection information from Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
Privacy policy of YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Privacy policy of Twitter:
https://twitter.com/privacy
3h. Taboola
We use services provided by Taboola Inc (1115 Broadway, 7th Floor, New York, NY 10010, USA) on our website. Taboola uses cookies that determine which content you use and which of our pages you visit.
These cookies are not used for personal identification, but only collect pseudonymized data.
Taboola collects the following user information by means of cookies: User’s operating system, web pages/content accessed on our websites, referrer/link through which the user came to our website, time and number of website visits, location information (city and state), IP addresses in shortened form.
If you visit certain pages of ours and the cookie has not yet expired, we and the providers can recognize that someone has clicked on the ad and thus been redirected to our site.
You can find more data protection information on Taboola at:
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy
.
The legal basis for data processing is your consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 subparagraph 1 lit. a GDPR or § 25 para. 1 TTDSG.
3i. SurveyMonkey
For individual surveys, we use the web service SurveyMonkey (SurveyMonkey Europe UC, 2nd Floor, 2 Shelbourne Buildings, Shelbourne Road, Ballsbridge, Dublin 4, Ireland) to create and analyse online surveys. Your Participation is voluntary.
SurveyMonkey collects information about the device and application you use to take the survey. This includes your IP address, operating system version, device type, device ID/MAC address, system and performance information, and browser type. If you participate in the survey via a mobile device, SurveyMonkey also collects the device’s UUID. SurveyMonkey also uses third-party tracking services, which in turn use cookies and page tags to collect usage data and user statistics. We have no control over the amount of data SurveyMonkey collects. In addition, SurveyMonkey collects response data, metadata and cookie data using machine learning techniques to develop new features and improve its service, detect fraud and develop products with aggregated data. This is also used to provide useful and relevant insights to survey companies, such as CleverReach in this case.
For more information about the cookies SurveyMonkey uses, privacy and retention periods, please visit the following link
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/privacy/
.
As a survey participant, you can contact us at any time to request deletion of your survey data, including personal data if collected. A subsequent correction of individual answers after the survey has been sent is not possible.
The legal basis for data processing is your consent in accordance with Art. 6 (1) lit. a DS-GVO or § 25 (1) TTDSG.
With your consent, you also consent to your data being processed in the USA pursuant to Art. 49 (1) p. 1a DSGVO. For transfers to the U.S., an adequate level of data protection is ensured by the certification of the provider under the adequacy decision (EU-U.S. Privacy Framework).
3j. WiredMinds
Our website uses the pixel-code technology of WiredMinds GmbH (
www.wiredminds.de
, Lindenspürstraße 32, 70176 Stuttgart) to analyse visitor behaviour. This involves processing the IP address of a visitor. The processing is carried out exclusively for the purpose of collecting company-relevant information such as the company name. IP addresses of natural persons are excluded from further use (whitelist procedure). The IP address is not stored in LeadLab under any circumstances. When processing the data, it is in our particular interest to protect the data protection rights of natural persons.
Our interest is based on Art. 6 para. 1 lit. (f) GDPR. The data we collect does not allow any conclusions to be drawn about an identifiable person at any time, and WiredMinds GmbH uses this information to create anonymous user profiles based on the visiting behaviour on our website. The data obtained is not used to personally identify visitors to our website. An order processing contract has been concluded with WireMinds GmbH in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR.
Exclude from tracking
(A technically necessary cookie is set to permanently exclude you from tracking by WiredMinds LeadLab on this website)
4. Explanation of safety measures
To protect your data from unwanted access as comprehensively as possible, we take technical and organizational measures. We use encryption on our pages. Your information is transmitted from your computer to our server and vice versa via the Internet using TLS encryption. You know this by the fact that the lock symbol is closed in the status bar of your browser and the address line starts with https://.
5. Rights of the data subject
When processing your personal data, GDPR grants you as a website user certain rights:
Right of access by the data subject (Art. 15 GDPR):
You have the right to obtain from the controller confirmation as to whether personal data concerning you are being processed; if this is the case, you have a right to access this personal data and to all information specified in Art. 15 GDPR.
Right to rectification and erasure (Art. 16 and 17 GDPR):
You have the right to request the immediate rectification of inaccurate personal data concerning you and, if necessary, the completion of incomplete personal data. You also have the right to obtain the immediate erasure of personal data concerning you if one of the reasons specified in Art. 17 GDPR applies, e.g. if the data is no longer required for the purposes pursued.
Right to restriction of processing (Art. 18 GDPR):
You have the right to request a restriction on processing if one of the conditions set out in Article 18 GDPR applies, e.g. if you have lodged an objection to processing, for the duration of any examination.
Right to data portability (Art. 20 GDPR):
In certain cases, which are listed in Article 20 of GDPR, you have the right to receive personal data concerning you in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format or to request the transmission of this data to a third party.
Right to object (Art. 21 GDPR):
If data is collected on the basis of Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR (data processing to protect legitimate interests), you have the right to object to the processing at any time for reasons arising from your particular situation. We will then no longer process your personal data unless there are demonstrably compelling reasons worthy of protection for the processing which outweigh the interests, rights and freedoms of the data subject, or the processing serves to assert, exercise or defend legal claims.
Right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority
According to Art. 77 GDPR, you have the right of appeal to a supervisory authority if you believe that the processing of data concerning you violates data protection regulations. The right of appeal may be exercised in particular before a supervisory authority in the Member State where you are staying, working or suspected of infringing.
6. Contact details of the data protection officer
Our company data protection officer will be happy to provide you with information or suggestions on the subject of data protection:
Dr. Uwe Schläger
datenschutz nord GmbH
Konsul-Smidt-Straße 88
28217 Bremen
Germany
Web: www.datenschutz-nord-gruppe.de
Email: office@datenschutz-nord.de
Phone: +49 421/696632-0
7. Newsletter on request
We offer you the opportunity to subscribe to our newsletter on our website. If you have given us your separate consent to inform you about our own products and services by email, the corresponding processing is based on Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR. In addition, we offer you the opportunity to subscribe to our info newsletter with relevant information about selected partners and their services for your email marketing. These are primarily services that can improve online marketing.
By registering for this newsletter, you agree that we may track your clicking and opening behavior in order to provide you with the best possible newsletter service. If we process your personal data on the basis of your consent, you may revoke your consent at any time without affecting the legality of the processing to date. If you do not wish to receive our newsletter in the future, you can easily unsubscribe at any time, e.g. by sending an email to
info@cleverreach.com
or by clicking on the unsubscribe link you can find in every newsletter email. Your personal data will be deleted within 3 months after the end of your newsletter subscription, provided that the deletion does not conflict with any legal obligation to retain your data.
8. Contact & Support Form
You have the option to contact us via web forms.
When you submit the form, you agree that the information you provide will be recorded electronically and stored for up to six years. The legal basis for processing your information in the contractual relationship is Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. b GDPR, otherwise Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR. The website operator has a legitimate interest in conducting the exchange you are seeking or in processing your request appropriately. We will only use your data this way.
a) Via our support website
To use
this
contact form, we only need your email address. You can provide more information, but it’s not required.
We use Zendesk, a software solution offered by Zendesk Inc. (1019 Market St, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA), to process your support or contact request. Your data is processed on Zendesk’s servers, which are located exclusively in the USA and comply with the GDPR. We have also made data protection agreements with Zendesk. These agreements include the EU’s standard data protection clauses. These agreements require Zendesk to process our customers’ data according to our instructions. Zendesk is also required to protect our customers’ data and not share it with third parties. Zendesk Inc. takes further technical precautions to protect personal data. Personal data is not shared with third parties, as outlined in Art. 4 No. 10 GDPR.
b) Via your CleverReach account
When you use
this
contact form, we record your email address, account number, browser used, and screen resolution data. You can provide more information, but it’s not required.
We use Usersnap, a software solution offered by Usersnap GmbH, to process your support or contact request. Usersnap GmbH is located at Herrenstrasse 6, A-4020 Linz, Austria, Europe. Your data is stored on servers hosted by Usersnap in data centers of AWS (Amazon Web Services), which are located exclusively in Europe (Germany or Ireland). Usersnap GmbH takes further technical precautions to protect personal data. Personal data is not shared with third parties, as outlined in Art. 4 No. 10 GDPR.
This data is also sent to Zendesk, which is offered by Zendesk Inc. The address is 1019 Market St, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA. Your data is processed on Zendesk’s servers, which are located exclusively in the USA and comply with the GDPR. We have also made data protection agreements with Zendesk that include the EU’s standard data protection rules. These agreements require Zendesk to process our customers’ data according to our instructions, to keep it secure, and not to share it with other companies. Zendesk Inc. takes further technical precautions to protect personal data. Personal data is not shared with third parties, as outlined in Art. 4 No. 10 GDPR.
9. Account registration to use our software
To use our CleverReach software for free, you need to register first. For account registration we collect your email address on the basis of Art. 6 (1) (b) GDPR. We will store your data until you object to its storage by email to info@cleverreach.com in which you wish to delete your account. If there are no legal retention periods, your data will be deleted within 10 days after you have entered your objection.
We will provide you with our free account in exchange for the ability to regularly send you news, promotions and product information via email. The CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG will use your data exclusively for the aforementioned purpose and will not pass it on to third parties. You can unsubscribe from the newsletter in any email or object to the storage of your data by email to info@cleverreach.com and request that we delete your data at any time, provided that the erasure does not conflict with any legal storage obligations.
We use the software solution HubSpot Sales Hub, provided by HubSpot, Inc., 25 First Street, Cambridge, MA 02141 USA, for the registration and administration of customer data. Your data is processed on servers hosted by HubSpot, Inc. in Germany, among other places, and within the scope of the GDPR. We have also entered into appropriate data protection agreements with HubSpot, Inc. (including in accordance with the EU standard data protection clauses or a DPA in accordance with order processing pursuant to Art. 28 GDPR) that require the provider to process our customers’ data strictly in accordance with our instructions, to protect it, and not to share it with third parties. HubSpot, Inc. takes additional technical precautions to protect personal information. We do not share personal data with third parties as defined by Art. 4 (10) GDPR.
10. Paid use
If you want to use our CleverReach software as a paid version, you have to register first. We store and use your personal data, which you transmit in the course of the registration or an order process, on the basis of Art. 6 (1) (b) GDPR exclusively for the processing of your orders. We will use your email address to inform you about the status of your order or to send you the respective receipts. We also offer you to send you account reports and news & product information by email.
If after the conclusion of a chargeable contract there is an obligation to provide us with your payment data (e.g. account number for direct debit authorization), this data is required for payment processing. Payment transactions via the common means of payment (Visa/MasterCard, PayPal, direct debiting) are made exclusively via an encrypted SSL or TLS connection.In the case of encrypted communication, your payment data you transmit to us cannot be read by third parties. We may transfer data to other responsible parties (such as PayPal (Europe) or Mollie B.V.) who are necessary payment service providers for the secure execution of the payment.
11. Use of Ratings
a. Description and scope of data processing
This website uses components of the rating portal of Trustpilot, TrustPilot A/S, Pilestraede 58, 5th Floor, 1112 Copenhagen, Denmark (hereinafter “Trustpilot”). CleverReach may contact you by email to invite you to evaluate the service or products you have received from us. For this purpose, your name, first name, email address and a reference number will be transmitted to Trustpilot. Trustpilot will neither use this information itself nor pass it on to third parties. The review will be verified using the reference number via a specially generated link. Submitting a review is voluntary. Sometimes it is necessary to create/open a user profile on Trustpilot in order to submit a review or record customer feedback. This user profile can also be used to submit reviews for any company on the Trustpilot review portal.
b. Legal basis for data processing
The processing of your rating data is voluntary and in accordance with Art. 6 (1 a) GDPR. By creating your user profile on Trustpilot, you consent to the processing by Trustpilot. We have concluded an order processing contract for the processing of the data in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR.
c. Purpose of data processing
The data is transferred as part of a customer relationship and to improve our services. We ask our customers to provide feedback for quality assurance and marketing purposes by publishing the feedback. CleverReach may also use such ratings in other advertising media and materials for advertising and promotional purposes.
d. Duration of storage, objection and deletion options
The data will only be stored for as long as necessary (purpose). Your data will then be deleted or made anonymous so that it can no longer be used to identify you. If you register with the review portal, we have no control over Trustpilot’s deletion periods. Please refer to Trustpilot’s privacy policy (see “Information from the third party provider”). You have the option to reject the review at any time by not agreeing to it. You can revoke your consent at any time for the future by sending a message to the rating platform itself (privacy@trustpilot.com).
e. Third Party Information
You can find Trustpilot’s privacy policy and general terms and conditions at:
https://legal.trustpilot.com/for-reviewers/end-user-privacy-terms
.
12. Applications, in particular via HCM4all
We process your data within the scope of applicant management for the purpose of deciding on establishing an employment relationship on the basis of § 26 of the Federal Data Protection Act (BDSG). We process the data you provide in the course of your (online) application exclusively for the purpose of selecting applicants. Data will not be processed for other purposes.
You yourself determine the scope of data that you would like to submit as part of your application. Applications are transmitted electronically to our Human Resources Department where they are processed as quickly as possible. Applications are forwarded to the heads of the relevant specialist departments in our company. Beyond that, your data will not be passed on. our information will be treated confidentially in our company. If your application is unsuccessful, your documents will be deleted after 6 months.
With your express consent, we will store your data for an additional 24 months in our applicant or talent pool to consider it in future job advertisements.
The talent pool is managed by the entire Ashampoo group of companies that consists of the following companies:
Ashampoo GmbH & Co. KG
CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG
Personizer GmbH & Co. KG
In case your application is considered for another vacant position at the Ashampoo group of companies, we will forward your application documents to the respective department and contact you by phone or e-mail if necessary. Your data will be processed based on art. 6 para. 1 lit. a, 7 GDPR in connection with § 26 paragraph 2 BDSG.
Your declaration of consent includes the processing of all data that you have made available to us within the scope of the application procedure. In addition, data that was necessary to process the application (correspondence, handwritten notes from job interviews, etc.) will also be processed and stored. Additionally, we may process job-related information made publicly available by you, such as a profile on business-related social media networks or online job portals.
Your data is only accessible to selected employees within the Ashampoo group of companies who are involved in filling vacant positions. Your data will only be passed on within the Ashampoo group of companies to the extent necessary for the application process. Your data will not be passed on to third parties or used for other purposes.
Unless you revoke your consent to the processing of your data in the talent pool, your data will be completely deleted after 24 months at the latest. You will not be informed about the deletion of your data.
You can revoke your consent informally at any time, e.g. by sending an e-mail to
hr@crash.immo
.
We use the software solution HCM4all GmbH, Trogerstraße 48, 81675 Munich, Germany, to carry out the application management.
We have also concluded appropriate data protection agreements with HCM4all (including the EU standard data protection clauses), by which we oblige the provider to process our applicants’ data strictly in accordance with instructions, to protect them and not to pass them on to third parties. HCM4all takes further technical precautions to protect personal data. A transfer of personal data to third parties in terms of Art. 4 (10) GDPR does not take place.
13. YouTube videos
Our website uses plugins from Google’s YouTube site. This website is operated by YouTube, LLC, 901 Cherry Ave, San Bruno, CA 94066, USA. If you visit one of our pages equipped with a YouTube plugin, a connection to the YouTube servers is established. The YouTube server is informed which of our pages you have visited. Furthermore, Youtube can store various cookies on your end device. With the help of these cookies, Youtube can obtain information about visitors to our website. This information is used, among other things, to collect video statistics, improve user-friendliness and prevent fraud attempts.
The cookies remain on your terminal until you delete them.
If you are logged into your YouTube account, you allow YouTube to associate your surfing behavior directly with your personal profile. You can prevent this by logging out of your YouTube account. The use of YouTube is in the interest of an appealing presentation of our online offers. This represents a legitimate interest within the meaning of Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR. Further information on how user data is handled can be found in YouTube’s data protection declaration at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
.
14. Captcha
To protect our web forms from automated queries, we use a third party captcha provider. As part of the captcha function, you may be asked to complete tasks or click on checkboxes. The user’s input and, where applicable, mouse movements are used to determine whether the input is from a human or an automated program. As the functionality is provided by a third party, displaying the captcha will cause the third party’s content to be reloaded. As a result, the third party receives information that you have accessed our site and the usage data technically required in this context. We have no control over the further processing of the data by the third party.
The embedding takes place on the basis of Art. 6 (1 lit. f)GDPR and in the interest of protection against spam and misuse.
If the data is processed in this context outside the EU or the EEA (in particular in the USA), we provide information on the level of data protection in the following table.
15. Online Seminars
If you would like to take part in our voluntary online seminars, a separate registration is required. For the online seminar registration, we collect your email address, first and last name on the basis of Art. 6 (1) (b) GDPR. Your data will be stored for 12 months (after the last registration) or until you object to the storage by sending an email to info@cleverreach.com and wish to delete your data. If there are no legal retention periods, your data will be deleted within 10 days after discussion of the revocation.
To conduct the online seminars we use the GoToWebinar software solution provided by LogMeIn Ireland Limited, Bloodstone Building Block C, 70 Sir John Rogerson’s Quay, Dublin 2, Ireland. Your data is processed on servers hosted by LogMeIn solely in the USA and within the scope of the GDPR. We have also entered into data protection agreements with LogMeIn (including the EU standard data protection clauses), in which we oblige the provider to process our customers’ data strictly in accordance with their instructions, to protect it and not to pass it on to third parties.
LogMeIn Limited takes additional technical precautions to protect personal information. Personal data is not transferred to third parties in accordance with Art. 4 (10) GDPR.
16. Integration Partners
If you are a developer interested in becoming one of our
integration partners
, we will need some information about your app as well as your contact details. This data processing is carried out for contact and verification purposes on the basis of your voluntary consent according to Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR. After our review, you will be publicly listed as an integration partner. Your contact details will be published. You may withdraw your consent at any time with future effect by sending an email to info@cleverreach.com and terminate the cooperation or listing as an integration partner.
We use an external service provider (Atlassian PTy Ltd) to verify and manage our integration partners. The service provider acts on our behalf under strict instructions in accordance with a data protection agreement and has taken appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect personal data. Your data will be transferred to the service provider and thus to a third country based on Art. 49 (1) (a) GDPR. You may withdraw your consent at any time by sending an email to info@cleverreach.com.
17. Publication of Agency Directory Entries
Our Agency Directory is published on our website. The individual entries contain the information provided when the entry was created, including your name, legal form and address, phone number, email address, logo, the languages you offer and use in email marketing campaigns, year of establishment, CleverReach client ID and website URL, as well as the type of services you offer, your area of specialization and your minimum budget. Your listing serves the fulfillment of the concluded contract according to Art. (6) (b) GDPR. Apart from the listing, there will be no further processing of your data. If you do not agree with the publication in the agency directory, you can terminate the contract according to legal regulations. We will store your data until you notify us that the entry should no longer be published.
18. Demo videos and product presentation
If you are interested in our services and products, we will be happy to present them to you in our demo videos. You may also have the opportunity to make an appointment with us for a personal product presentation as a video conference. We will then present the individual services and products to you in a personal meeting. After sending your enquiry, we may send you an e-mail with further information to the e-mail address you have provided.
For the assignment, planning, administration and implementation of a personal product presentation, we collect your e-mail address, your first and last name, your company website and other information on your intended use of the services and products via the contact form provided for this purpose on the basis of legitimate interest pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f) GDPR. You yourself determine which data you share with us and can object to this data processing at any time with effect for the future. Your data will be stored for 6 months or until you object to the storage by e-mail to info@cleverreach.com and wish to delete your data. If there are no statutory retention periods, your data will be deleted within 10 days of your objection being raised.
We use Google Meet/ Google Calendar, offered by Google LCC / Google Ireland Ltd, for the allocation, planning, administration and implementation of the personal product presentation. Your data is processed for these purposes on the servers hosted by Google within the scope of the GDPR. We have also concluded corresponding data protection agreements with Google (including in accordance with the EU standard data protection clauses or on the basis of the EU Commission’s adequacy decision), with which we oblige the provider to process our customers’ data strictly in accordance with our instructions, to protect it and not to pass it on to third parties. Google takes further technical precautions to protect personal data. Personal data is not transferred to third parties within the meaning of Art. 4 (10) GDPR.
19. Product test registration
We offer you the opportunity to take part in our product tests on our website. We process the data you enter for participation in the product test. This includes sending you information about the product test, documenting your participation and analysing your surfing and clicking behaviour within the test products. The legal basis for this data processing is the voluntary consent given by you through registration and confirmation in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a), Art. 9 para. 2 lit. a) GDPR. Your data will not be passed on to third parties. The data will be processed for 6 months after completion of the product test and then deleted. You can revoke your consent at any time with effect for the future (by e-mail to testing@cleverreach.com). You will also receive regular information about the product tests from us by e-mail. You can unsubscribe from the product test mailing list at any time.
Try newsletter tool for free
*
Create and send professional newsletters in just a few minutes. Sign up for free and get started.*
Or
**Min. 8 characters, including 1 number & 1 capital letter
I would also like to receive offers and relevant information from selected CleverReach partners via email from time to time.
Anti-Robot Verification
Click to start verification
Friendly
Captcha ⇗
Sign up for free
Sign up for free
I have already an account
*We will provide you with the free account in exchange for the opportunity to regularly send you news, promotions and product information via email. CleverReach GmbH & Co KG will use your data exclusively for the aforementioned purpose and will not pass it on to third parties. You can unsubscribe from any mailing or object to the storage of your data by sending an email to info@cleverreach.com and delete your data at any time, provided that the deletion does not conflict with any statutory retention periods.
CleverReach is only aimed at entrepreneurs and therefore does not take consumer protection into account. By submitting the data you have entered, you consent to data processing, confirm our
terms and conditions
and have the chance to read our
privacy policy
.
Sub-policy 1
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active:
Skip to content
Google LLC
Active Participant
Other Covered Entities
Industries
Participation
Privacy Policy
Dispute Resolution
Other Covered Entities
See Purposes of Data Collection section for details on scope of cert
Industries
Information and Communications Technology
Information Technology Services
Participation
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Framework:
Active
Original Certification Date:  9/14/2023
Next Certification Due Date: 9/13/2024
Data Collected: HR, NON-HR
Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Framework:
Active
Original Certification Date:  4/18/2017
Next Certification Due Date: 9/13/2024
Data Collected: HR, NON-HR
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Framework:
Active
Original Certification Date:  9/22/2016
Next Certification Due Date: 9/13/2024
Data Collected: HR, NON-HR
Purpose of Data Collection
This certification applies to Google LLC and its wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries, including X (a division of Google LLC) and Chronicle LLC, and any other wholly-owned U.S. subsidiary of Google LLC to the extent of any current separate self-certification by such entity.  With respect to personal data other than human resources data: Data is processed for various purposes depending on the particular product or service being provided, including: sales and marketing to consumers and businesses; supplying services and products to consumers and businesses; operating, developing and improving services and products of Google and/or any of its wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries identified below; personalizing services and products; financial processing and management; supplier, vendor and partner relationship management; fraud prevention, security, and protection of Google, its wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries, and our users; compliance with applicable law and governmental, legislative and regulatory bodies; and customer support and relationship management. Data is disclosed to third parties as detailed in our relevant Privacy Policies, listed below, including: in situations in which we have consent, for external processing, with domain administrators, and for legal reasons. With respect to human resources data: Data is processed for various employment and legal purposes, including: recruitment and staffing; compensation, benefit programs and payroll; performance management and training; compliance and risk management; workplace management; protection against injury, theft, legal liability, fraud and abuse; and other business purposes. Data is disclosed to third parties as detailed in our relevant Privacy Policies, listed below, including for business-related and legal purposes.

We currently do not rely on the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks and the UK Extension to transfer Swiss and UK personal information to the U.S..
Privacy Policy
HR Data
Google Employee Privacy Policy
Description:
Describes how Google collects and uses employee data. Available to employees on Google internal sites and services. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for Google Employee Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
HR and Non-HR Data
Document:
Actifio Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) will serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
BreezoMeter
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) will serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 10/1/2023
Document:
Dataform Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) will serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/11/2023
Document:
Elastifile Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Extended Workforce Privacy Privacy Policy
Description:
The Extended Workforce Privacy Policy explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Fitbit Privacy Policy
Description:
The Fitbit Privacy Policy describes the privacy practices for our devices, applications, software, websites, APIs, products, and services. The Privacy Policy covers the data we collect, how we use it, the controls we offer, and security measures we take.
Effective Date: 6/6/2023
Document:
Google Careers Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 8/31/2023
Document:
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy notice.
Effective Date: 8/21/2023
Document:
Google Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 7/1/2023
Document:
Google Registry Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Kaggle Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/15/2023
Document:
Looker Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/20/2023
Document:
Privacy Policy for Nest Websites
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Privacy Statement for Nest's Products and Services
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy statement.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Qwiklabs Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/14/2023
Document:
SecOps Privacy Notice
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/7/2023
Verification Method
Self-Assessment
Dispute Resolution
Questions or Complaints?
If you have a question or complaint regarding the covered data, please contact Google LLC at:
Keith Enright
Chief Privacy Officer
Google LLC
Google Data Protection Office
1600 Amphitheatre Pkwy
Mountain View, California  94043-1351
dpf-core-team@google.com
Phone:
(650) 253-0000
Fax: 650.618.1806
Privacy Shield organizations must respond within 45 days of receiving a complaint.
If you have not received a timely or satisfactory response from Google LLC to your question or complaint, please contact the independent recourse mechanism listed below
HR RECOURSE MECHANISM
EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs)
UK Information Commissioner's Office (ICO)
NON-HR RECOURSE MECHANISM
EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs)
Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC)
UK Information Commissioner's Office (ICO)
Appropriate statutory body with jurisdiction to investigate any claims against Google LLC regarding possible unfair or deceptive practices and violations of laws or regulations covering privacy
Federal Trade Commission
Sub-policy 2
http://www.google.com/privacy/ads/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Advertising
Advertising keeps Google and many of the websites and services you use free of charge. We work hard to make sure that ads are safe, unobtrusive, and as relevant as possible. For example, you won’t see pop-up ads on Google, and we terminate the accounts of hundreds of thousands of publishers and advertisers that violate our policies each year – including ads containing malware, ads for counterfeit goods, or ads that attempt to misuse your personal information.
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses cookies in advertising
Cookies help to make advertising more effective. Without cookies, it’s harder for an advertiser to reach its audience, or to know how many ads were shown and how many clicks they received.
Many websites, such as news sites and blogs, partner with Google to show ads to their visitors. Working with our partners, we may use cookies for a number of purposes, such as to stop you from seeing the same ad over and over again, to detect and stop click fraud, and to show ads that are likely to be more relevant (such as ads based on websites you have visited).
We store a record of the ads we serve in our logs. These
server logs
typically include your web request, IP address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser or, if you are signed-in, that may uniquely identify you. We store this data for a number of reasons, the most important of which are to improve our services and to maintain the security of our systems. We anonymize this log data by removing part of the IP address (after 9 months) and cookie information (after 18 months).
Our advertising cookies
To help our partners manage their advertising and websites, we offer many products, including AdSense, AdWords, Google Analytics, and a range of DoubleClick-branded services. When you visit a page or see an ad that uses one of these products, either on Google services or on other sites and apps, various cookies may be sent to your browser.
These may be set from a few different domains, including google.com, doubleclick.net, googlesyndication.com, or googleadservices.com, or the domain of our partners’ sites. Some of our advertising products enable our partners to use other services in conjunction with ours (like an ad measurement and reporting service), and these services may send their own cookies to your browser. These cookies will be set from their domains.
See more detail about the
types of cookies used by Google
and our partners and
how we use them
.
How you can control advertising cookies
You can use
ad settings
to manage the Google ads you see and turn off personalized ads. Even if you turn off personalized ads, you may still see ads based on factors such as your general location derived from your IP address, your browser type, and your search terms.
You can also manage many companies’ cookies used for online advertising via the consumer choice tools created under self-regulation programs in many countries, such as the US-based
aboutads.info choices
page or the EU-based
Your Online Choices
.
Finally, you can
manage cookies in your web browser
.
Other technologies used in advertising
Google’s advertising systems may use other technologies, including Flash and HTML5, for functions like display of interactive ad formats. We may use the
IP address
, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also select advertising based on information about your computer or device, such as the time and date, your device model, browser type, or sensors in your device like the accelerometer.
Location
Google’s ad products may receive or infer information about your location from a variety of sources. For example, we may use the IP address to identify your general location; we may receive precise location from your mobile device; we may infer your location from your search queries; and websites or apps that you use may send information about your location to us.  Google uses location information in our ads products to infer demographic information, to improve the relevance of the ads you see, to measure ad performance and to report aggregate statistics to advertisers.
Advertising identifiers for mobile apps
To serve ads in services where cookie technology may not be available (for example, in mobile applications), we may use technologies that perform similar functions to cookies. Sometimes Google links the identifier used for advertising on mobile applications to an advertising cookie on the same device in order to coordinate ads across your mobile apps and mobile browser. This can happen, for example, when you see an ad within an app that launches a web page in your mobile browser. This also helps us improve the reports we give to our advertisers on the effectiveness of their campaigns.
Ads you see on your device may be personalized based on its Advertising ID. On Android devices, you can:
Reset your device’s advertising ID
, which replaces the current ID with a new one. Apps can still show you personalized ads, but for a while they may not be as relevant or interesting to you.
Delete your device’s advertising ID
, which deletes the advertising ID and doesn't assign a new one. Apps can still show you ads, but they may not be as relevant or interesting to you. You won't see ads based on this advertising ID, but you may still see ads based on other factors, like the information you’ve shared with apps.
To make changes to the advertising ID on your Android device, follow the instructions below.
Android
Reset your device’s advertising ID
To reset your device’s advertising ID:
On your Android device, go to
Settings
.
Tap
Privacy
>
Ads
.
Tap
Reset advertising ID
and confirm your changes.
Delete your device’s advertising ID
To delete your device’s advertising ID:
On your Android device, go to
Settings
.
Tap
Privacy
>
Ads
.
Tap
Delete advertising ID
and confirm your changes.
Your advertising ID will be reset or deleted, but apps may have their own settings using other types of identifiers, which can also affect the types of ads you see.
On some older versions of Android
If your Android device’s version is 4.4 or older:
Open
Settings
Tap
Privacy
>
Advanced
>
Ads
Turn on
Opt out of Ads Personalization
and confirm your changes.
iOS
Devices with iOS use Apple’s Advertising Identifier. To learn more about your choices for use of this identifier, visit the
Settings
app on your device.
Connected TV/Over-the-Top
Advertising identifiers for connected TV
Connected TVs are another area where cookie technology is not available, and, instead, Google will rely on device identifiers designed for use in advertising to serve ads. Many connected TV devices support an identifier for advertising that is similar in function to mobile device identifiers. These identifiers are built to give users the option to reset them or to opt out of personalized advertising entirely.
The following “Ads” settings are available on TVs with the following consistent language:
Reset advertising ID
Delete advertising ID
Opt out of Ads Personalization (on or off)
Ads by Google (links to About Google ad personalization)
Your advertising ID (long string)
These Ads settings are available in the following paths on Google TV and Android TV respectively.
Google TV
Consistent path to Ads:
Settings
Privacy
Ads
Android TV
Ads settings show up in one of two general paths for Android TV depending on the TV manufacturer/model. In Android TV, partners have the freedom to adapt the Settings path. It’s up to the partner which path they use to best fit their custom TV experience but below are the common paths to Ad settings.
Path A:
Settings
About
Legal Information
Ads
Path B:
Settings
Devices Preferences
About
Legal Information
Ads
Non-Google Devices
Many connected TV devices support identifiers for advertising and offer ways for users to opt out of personalized advertising. A full list of those devices, and ways users can opt out, is kept updated on the Network Advertising Initiative’s website here:
https://thenai.org/opt-out/connected-tv-choices/
.
What determines the ads by Google that I see?
Many decisions are made to determine which ad you see.
Sometimes the ad you see is based on your current or past location. Your IP address is usually a good indication of your approximate location. So you might see an ad on the homepage of YouTube.com that promotes a forthcoming movie in your country, or a search for ‘pizza’ might return results for pizza places in your town.
Sometimes the ad you see is based on the context of a page. If you’re looking at a page of gardening tips, you might see ads for gardening equipment.
Sometimes you might also see an ad on the web that’s based on your app activity or activity on Google services; an in-app ad that’s based on your web activity; or an ad based on your activity on another device.
Sometimes the ad you see on a page is served by Google but selected by another company. For example, you might have registered with a newspaper website. From information you’ve given the newspaper, it can make decisions about which ads to show you, and it can use Google’s ad serving products to deliver those ads.
The ad you see on a household device, such as a connected TV (such as a Smart TV), may be related to the web or app activity from devices within the same household.
You may also see ads on Google products and services, including Search, Gmail, and YouTube, based on information, such as your email address, that you provided to advertisers and the advertisers then shared with Google.
Why am I seeing ads by Google for products I’ve viewed?
You may see ads for products you previously viewed. Let’s suppose you visit a website that sells golf clubs, but you don’t buy those clubs on your first visit. The website owner might want to encourage you to return and complete your purchase. Google offers services that let website operators target their ads to people who visited their pages.
For this to work, Google either reads a cookie that’s already in your browser or places a cookie in your browser when you visit the golfing site (assuming your browser lets this happen).
When you visit another site that works with Google, which may have nothing to do with golfing, you might see an ad for those golf clubs. That’s because your browser sends Google the same cookie. In turn, we may use that cookie to serve you an ad that could encourage you to buy those golf clubs.
Your visit to the golfing site may also be used by Google to show you personalized ads when you later search for golf clubs on Google.
We do have restrictions on this type of ad. For example, we prohibit advertisers from selecting an audience based on sensitive information, such as health information or religious beliefs.
Learn more about
Google ads
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 3
http://www.google.de/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 4
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/:
Notice
You must log in to continue.
Log Into Facebook
You must log in to continue.
Log In
Forgot account?
·
Sign up for Facebook
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 5
http://twitter.com/privacy:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy
Privacy Settings
Privacy Center
Help Center
Policy Archive
Download PDF
X Privacy Policy
Effective: November 15, 2024
Before you scroll, read this
It’s really hard to make everyone happy with a Privacy Policy. Most people who use X want something short and easy to understand. While we wish we could fit everything you need to know into a post, our regulators ask us to meet our legal obligations by describing them all in a lot of detail.
With that in mind, we’ve written our Privacy Policy as simply as possible to empower you to make informed decisions when you use X by making sure you understand and have control over the information we collect, how it’s used, and when it’s shared.
So if you skip reading every word of the Privacy Policy, at least know this:
X is a public platform
Learn what’s viewable & searchable
We collect some data
about you
Learn what we collect & how
Affiliate services may have their own policies
Learn about affiliates
We use your data to make X better
Learn how we make your info work
You can control your experience
Learn how to update your settings
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask
Learn how to contact us
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
1. Information We Collect
The information we collect when you use X falls into three categories.
1.1 Information you provide us.
To use some of our products and services you need to have an account, and to create an account, you need to provide us certain information. Likewise, if you use our paid products and services, we cannot provide them to you without getting payment information. Basically, certain information is necessary if you want to use many of our products and services.
Personal Accounts.
If you create an account, you must provide us with some information so that we can provide our services to you. This includes a display name (for example, “Creators”); a username (for example, @XCreators); a password; an email address or phone number; a date of birth; your display language; and third-party single sign-in information (if you choose this sign-in method). You can also choose to share your location in your profile and posts, and to upload your address book to X to help find people you may know. Your profile information, which includes your display name and username, is always public, but you can use either your real name or a pseudonym. And remember, you can create multiple X accounts, for example, to express different parts of your identity, professional or otherwise.
Professional Accounts.
If you create a
professional account
, you also need to provide us with a professional category, and may provide us with other information, including street address, contact email address, and contact phone number, all of which will always be public.
Payment Information.
In order to purchase ads or other offerings provided as part of our paid products and services you will need to provide us payment information, including your credit or debit card number, card expiration date, CVV code, and billing address.
Preferences.
When you set your preferences using your
settings
, we collect that information so that we can respect your preferences.
Biometric Information.
Based on your consent, we may collect and use your biometric information for safety, security, and identification purposes.
Job Applications / Recommendations.
We may collect and use your personal information (such as your biographical information, employment history, educational history, employment preferences, skills and abilities, and job search activity and engagement, in addition to the information we already collect as disclosed in the “Information we collect when you use X” section of our Privacy Policy below) to recommend potential jobs to you, to share with potential employers when you apply for a job, to enable connections for professional opportunities, and to show you more relevant advertising.
1.2 Information we collect when you use X.
When you use our services, we collect information about how you use our products and services. We use that information to provide you with products and services, to help keep X more secure and respectful for everyone, and more relevant to you.
Usage Information.
We collect information about your activity on X, including:
Posts and other content you post (including the date, application, and version of X) and information about your broadcast activity (e.g., Spaces), including broadcasts you’ve created and when you created them, your lists, bookmarks, and Communities you are a part of.
Your interactions with other users’ content, such as reposts, likes, bookmarks, shares, downloads, replies, if other users mention or tag you in content or if you mention or tag them, and broadcasts you’ve participated in (including your viewing history, listening, commenting, speaking, and reacting).
How you interact with others on the platform, such as people you follow and people who follow you, metadata related to
Encrypted Messages
, and when you use
Direct Messages
, including the contents of the messages, the recipients, and date and time of messages.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will collect information about the communication and its content.
We collect information on links you interact with across our services (including in our emails sent to you).
Purchase and payments.
To allow you to make a payment or send money using X features or services, including through an intermediary, we may receive information about your transaction such as when it was made, when a subscription is set to expire or auto-renew, and amounts paid or received.
Device Information.
We collect information from and about the devices you use to access X, including:
Information about your connection, such as your IP address, browser type, and related information.
Information about your device and its settings, such as device and advertising ID, operating system, carrier, language, memory, apps installed, and battery level.
Your device address book, if you’ve chosen to share it with us.
Location Information.
When you use X, we collect some information about your approximate location to provide the service you expect, including showing you relevant ads. You can also choose to share your current precise location or places where you’ve previously used X by enabling these settings in your account.
Inferred Identity.
We may collect or receive information that we use to infer your identity as detailed below:
When you sign into X on a browser or device, we will associate that browser or device with your account. Subject to your settings, we may also associate your account with browsers or devices other than those you use to sign into X (or associate your signed-out device or browser with other browsers or devices or X-generated identiﬁers).
When you provide other information to X, including an email address or phone number, we associate that information with your X account. Subject to your settings, we may also use this information in order to infer other information about your identity, for example by associating your account with hashes of email addresses that share common components with the email address you have provided to X.
When you access X and are not signed in, we may infer your identity based on the information we collect.
Log Information.
We may receive information when you view content on or otherwise interact with our products and services, even if you have not created an account or are signed out, such as:
IP address and related information; browser type and language; operating system; the referring webpage; access times; pages visited; location; your mobile carrier; device information (including device and application IDs); search terms and IDs (including those not submitted as queries); ads shown to you on X; X-generated identiﬁers; and identiﬁers associated with cookies. We also receive log information when you click on, view, or interact with links on our services, including when you install another application through X.
Advertisements.
When you view or interact with ads we serve on or oﬀ X, we may collect information about those views or interactions (e.g., watching a video ad or preroll, clicking on an ad, interacting with reposts of or replies to an ad).
Cookies and similar technologies.
Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our services. Cookies are not required for many parts of our products and services such as searching and looking at public proﬁles. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
Interactions with our content on third-party sites.
When you view our content on third-party websites that integrate X content, such as embedded timelines or post buttons, we may receive log information that includes the web page you visited.
1.3 Information we receive from third parties.
When you use other online products and services, they may share information about that usage with us.
Ad Partners, Developers, Publishers.
Our ad and business partners share information with us such as browser cookie IDs, X-generated identifiers,
mobile device IDs, hashed user information like email addresses, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on a website or app. Some of our ad partners, particularly our advertisers, also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives,
generates, or infers
about you described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy.
Other Third Parties, Account Connections, and Integrations.
We may receive information about you from third parties who are not our ad partners, such as other X users, developers, and partners who help us evaluate the safety and quality of content on our platform, our
corporate affiliates
, and other services you link to your X account. You may choose to connect your X account to your account on another service, and that other service may send us information about your account on that service.
2. How We Use Information
Breaking down how we use the information we collect is not simple because of the way the systems that bring our services to you work. For example, the same piece of information may be used differently for different purposes to ultimately deliver a single service. We think it’s most useful to describe the five main ways we use information and if you have questions that are not answered, you can always
contact us
. Here we go:
2.1 Operate, improve, and personalize our services.
We use the information we collect to provide and operate X products and services. We also use the information we collect to improve and personalize our products and services so that you have a better experience on X, including by showing you more relevant content and ads, suggesting people and topics to follow, enabling and helping you discover
affiliates
, third-party apps, and services. We may use the information we collect and publicly available information to help train our machine learning or artificial intelligence models for the purposes outlined in this policy.
We may use the information we collect from accounts of other services that you choose to connect to your X account to provide you features like cross-posting or cross-service authentication, and to operate our services.
We use your contact information to help others find your account if your settings permit, including through third-party services and client applications.
We use your information to provide our advertising and sponsored content services subject to your
settings
, which helps make ads on X more relevant to you. We also use this information to measure the effectiveness of ads and to help recognize your devices to serve you ads on and off of X. Some of our ad partners also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives, generates, or infers about you, as described elsewhere in our Privacy Policy.
2.2  Foster safety and security.
We use information we collect to provide for the safety and security of our users, our products, services, and your account. This includes verifying your identity, authenticating your account, and defending against fraud, unauthorized use, and illegal activity. We also use the information to evaluate and affect the safety and quality of content on X - this includes investigating and enforcing our policies and and terms, as well as applicable law.
2.3 Measure, analyze and make our services better.
We use the information we collect to measure and analyze the effectiveness of our products and services and to better understand how you use them in order to make them better.
2.4 Communicate with you about our services.
We use the information we collect to communicate with you about our products and services, including about product updates and changes to our policies and terms. If you’re open to hearing from us, we may also send you marketing messages from time to time.
2.5 Research.
We use information you share with us, or that we collect to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
3. Sharing Information
You should know the ways we share your information, why we share it, and how you can control it. There are five general ways we share your information.
3.1 When you post and share.
With the general public
. You are directing us to disclose that information as broadly as possible. X content, including your profile information (e.g., name/pseudonym, username, profile pictures), is available for viewing by the general public. The public does not need to be signed in to view some content on X. They may also find X content off of X: for example, from search query results on Internet search engines or videos downloaded and reshared elsewhere (depending on your
settings
).
With other X users.
Depending on your
settings
, and based on the X products and services you use, we share:
Your interactions with X content of other users, such as replies, and people you follow.
Content you send to a specific X user, such as through
Direct Messages
. Please keep in mind that if you’ve shared information like Direct Messages or protected posts with someone else who accesses X through a third-party service, the information may be shared with the third-party service.
With partners.
Depending on your
settings
, we also provide certain third parties with information to help us offer or operate our products and services. You can learn more about these partnerships in our
Help Center
. You can control whether X shares your personal information with these partners by using the “Data sharing with business partners” option in your
Privacy & Safety settings
. (This setting does not control sharing described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, such as when we share information with our service providers, or through partnerships other than as described in this
Help Center
article.)
3.2 With third parties & third-party integrations.
With service providers.
We may share your information with our
service providers
that perform functions and provide services on our behalf, including payment services providers who facilitate payments; service providers that host our various blogs and wikis; service providers that help us understand the use of our services; applicant tracking system providers to send and receive applicant and job data to potential employers; and those that provide fraud detection services.
With advertisers.
Advertising revenue enables us to provide our products and services. Advertisers may learn information from your engagement with their ads on or off X. For example, if you click on an external link or ad on our services, that advertiser or website operator might figure out that you came from X, along with other information associated with the ad you clicked, such as characteristics of the audience it was intended to reach and other X-generated identifiers for that ad. They may also collect other personal information from you, such as cookie identifiers, or your IP address.
Third-party content & integrations.
We share or disclose your information with your consent or at your direction, such as when you
authorize a third-party web client or application
to access your account or when you direct us to share your feedback with a business. Similarly, to improve your experience, we work with third-party partners to display their video content on X or to allow cross-platform sharing. When you watch or otherwise interact with content from our video or cross-platform sharing partners, they may receive and process your personal information as described in their privacy policies. For video content, you can adjust your
autoplay settings
if you prefer that content not to play automatically.
Third-party collaborators.
Depending on your
settings
, or if you decide to share your data, we may share or disclose your information with third parties. If you do not opt out, in some instances the recipients of the information may use it for their own independent purposes in addition to those stated in X’s Privacy Policy, including, for example, to train their artificial intelligence models, whether generative or otherwise.
Through our APIs.
We use technology like
APIs
and embeds to make public X information available to websites, apps, and others for their use, for example, displaying posts on a news website or analyzing what people say on X. We generally make this content available in limited quantities for free and charge licensing fees for large-scale access. We have
standard terms
that govern how this information can be used, and a compliance program to enforce these terms. But these individuals and companies are not affiliated with X, and their offerings may not reflect updates you make on X. For more information about how we make public data on X available to the world, visit
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 When required by law, to prevent harm, or in the public interest.
We may preserve, use, share, or disclose your information if we believe that it is reasonably necessary to:
comply with a law, regulation,
legal process, or governmental request
;
protect the safety of any person, protect the safety or integrity of our platform, including to help prevent spam, abuse, or malicious actors on our services;
explain why we have removed content or accounts from our services (e.g., for a violation of
our Rules
);
address fraud, security, or technical issues; or
protect our rights or property, or the rights or property of those who use our services.
We may also use different signals and your data to infer, preserve, use, share, or disclose your age and identity information in order to comply with regulatory requirements as well as for safety, security, fraud, know-your-customer, know-your-business, and identity verification, as the case may be. We may also share or disclose your age and identity information with our partners, service providers, and others for these purposes.
3.4 With our Affiliates.
We may share information amongst our
affiliates
to provide our products and services.
3.5 As a result of a change in ownership.
We may share, sell, or transfer information about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, or bankruptcy. This Privacy Policy will apply to your personal information that is shared with (before and after the close of any transaction) or transferred to the new entity.
4. How Long We Keep Information
We keep different types of information for different periods of time, depending on how long we need to retain it in order to provide you with our products and services, to comply with our legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
We keep your profile information, such as your display name, user name, password and email address for the duration of your account. We cannot provide you with our products and services without retaining this information.
We keep your usage information, such as the content you post, your interactions with other users’ content and how you interact with others on the platform for the duration of your account or until such content is removed.
We keep your payment information, including your credit or debit card number and billing address for the duration you use our paid products and services. Records of transactions will be kept for longer, in accordance with applicable law.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will keep information about the communication and its content for up to 18 months, unless it is necessary for us to retain it for a longer period to comply with our legal obligations or to exercise or defend our legal rights.
We generally collect device information, location information, inferred identity information and log information using cookies. We keep cookies and information collected using cookies for up to 13 months. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
We keep information about your views or interactions with ads on or off X, as well as how you interact with our content on third-party sites for up to 90 days.
We keep information shared by ad and business partners for up to 90 days.
Where you violate our Rules and your account is suspended, we may keep the identifiers you used to create the account (such as your email address or phone number) indefinitely to prevent repeat policy offenders from creating new accounts.
We may need to keep certain information longer than our policies specify in order to comply with legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
To comply with a law, regulation, legal process or governmental request.
Including in order to adhere to a legally appropriate preservation request made by law enforcement. You can read more about law enforcement access
here
.
In connection with legal claims, litigation and regulatory matters.
Including where it is reasonably necessary to retain information relating to your account in order to defend X against legal claims.
To maintain the safety and security of our products and services.
Including where it is necessary to store your information longer in order to investigate and fight abuse on our products and services.
Remember public content can exist elsewhere even after it is removed from X. For example, search engines and other third parties may retain copies of your posts longer, based upon their own privacy policies, even after they are deleted or expire on X. You can read more about search visibility
here
.
5. Take Control
5.1 Access, Correction, Portability.
You can access, correct, or modify the information you provided to us by editing your profile and adjusting your account
settings
.
You can learn more about the information we have collected or inferred about you in
Your X Data
and request access to additional information
here
.
You can download a copy of your information, such as your posts, by following the instructions
here
.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with a deletion, portability, or other related request. We may, in certain situations, reject your request for access, correction, or portability, for example, we may reject access where you are unable to verify your identity.
5.2 Deleting your Information.
If you follow the instructions
here
, your account will be deactivated and your data will be queued for deletion. When deactivated, your X account, including your display name, username, and public profile, will no longer be viewable on X.com, X for iOS, and X for Android. For up to 30 days after deactivation it is still possible to restore your X account if it was accidentally or wrongfully deactivated.
5.3 Objecting to, Restricting, or Withdrawing your Consent.
You can manage your privacy settings and other account features
here
. If you change your settings it may take some time for your choices to be fully reflected throughout our systems. You may also notice changes in your X experience or limitations in your ability to access certain features depending on the settings you’ve adjusted. You may also manage additional settings when interacting with certain content and features on different parts of the platform, such as whether a
Space
is recorded, or whether
videos you upload
are downloadable by others.
5.4 Authorized Agent Requests.
To submit a request related to access, modification, or deletion of your information, or someone else’s information if you are their authorized agent, you may also contact us as specified in the How To Contact X section of our Privacy Policy below. We may require you to provide additional information for verification.
6. Your Rights and Ours
We provide X to people all over the world and provide many of the same privacy tools and controls to all of our users regardless of where they live. However, your experience may be slightly different than users in other countries to ensure X respects local requirements.
6.1 We have specific legal bases to use your information.
X has carefully considered the legal reasons it is permitted to collect, use, share and otherwise process your information. If you want to dig in to learn more and better understand the nuances, we’d encourage you to check out
this additional information about data processing
. And no, we don’t sell your personal information.
6.2 We move your data to make X work for you.
Just as you use X to seamlessly participate in global conversations with people in countries all over the world, X must move information across borders and to different countries around the world to support the safe and reliable service you depend on. For example, if you live in Europe and are having a conversation with someone in the United States, information has to move between those countries to provide that experience – it’s what you expect from us.
We also use data centers and cloud providers, and engage
our affiliates
and third-party partners and
service providers
located in many parts of the world to help us provide our services. Before we move data between countries we look at the risks that may be presented to the data and rely on
standard contractual clauses
(SCCs), where applicable, to ensure your data rights are protected. To request a copy of the SCCs, please contact us
here
. If data will be shared with a third party, we require them to maintain the same protections over your data that we provide directly.
X is a
participant
in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. X complies with the DPF Principles for all its processing of personal data received from the European Union, Switzerland and the UK, in reliance on the EU-US DPF, Swiss-US DPF and UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, respectively. If you have an inquiry or complaint related to our participation in the DPF, please contact us
here
. As part of our participation in the DPF, if you have a dispute with us about our adherence to the DPF Principles, we will seek to resolve it through our internal complaint resolution process, alternatively through the US-based independent dispute resolution body
JAMS
, and under certain conditions, through the DPF Arbitration Process following the procedures and subject to the conditions described in
Annex 1
to the DPF Principles. DPF participants are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission and other authorized statutory bodies. Under certain circumstances, participants may be liable for the transfer of personal data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to third parties outside the EU, Switzerland and the UK. Learn more about the EU-US DPF, the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
here
.
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs our processing of your personal data and we may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time as needed.
If we do revise this Privacy Policy and make changes that are determined by us to be material, we will provide you notice and an opportunity to review the revised Privacy Policy before you continue to use X.
9. General
The X Privacy Policy is written in English but is made available in multiple languages through translations. X strives to make the translations as accurate as possible to the original English version. However, in case of any discrepancies or inconsistencies, the English language version of the X Privacy Policy shall take precedence. You acknowledge that English shall be the language of reference for interpreting and constructing the terms of the X Privacy Policy.
10. How To Contact X
We want to hear from you if you have thoughts or questions about this Privacy Policy. You can contact us via our
Privacy Policy Inquiries
page or by writing to us at the appropriate address below.
Information about our handling of California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) requests is available
here
. Information about our handling of “Consumer Health Data” and associated requests as defined under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act and other similar state laws is available
here
.
If you live in the United States or any other country outside of the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is X Corp., with an address of:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
If you live in the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is Twitter International Unlimited Company, with an address of:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRELAND
If you live in Switzerland, you can also contact our appointed representative at the following address:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
If you wish to raise a concern about our
data processing practices
, you have the right to do so with your local supervisory authority or Twitter International Unlimited Company’s lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, using the
contact details
listed on their website.
View previous policies
Take control of your privacy
Adjust your settings
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 6
http://www.playbuzz.com/PrivacyPolicy:
Playbuzz Privacy Policy
Last Updated: Oct 2024
EX.CO Technologies Ltd. (“
we
”, “
us
”, “
Company
”) prepared this Privacy Policy to explain to its Customers, Website Visitors and End Users (as defined below, and collectively, “
you
”) how and why it collects Personal Data when you are using the online advertising platform (“
Platform
”) and websites, including www.ex.co and www.playbuzz.com or any other site owned by us and which refers to this policy (collectively “
Websites
”; and together with the Platform – the “
Services
”). This Privacy Policy together with the cookie policies referred to below, and any other document referred to herein, constitutes an integral part of
EX.CO's Terms
and
Playbuzz's Terms
, all of which are incorporated herein by reference.
Our Websites may link to third-party sites which are not governed by this Privacy Policy, please be aware that we are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of other sites. We encourage you to read the privacy statements provided by other sites as well. If you do not agree to this policy, please discontinue, and avoid using our Services. You have the right to cease using the Services at any time, pursuant to this Privacy Policy and our Terms. You are not legally required to provide us with any Personal Data, but without it we may not be able to provide you with the best experience or full functionality of our Services.
If you have a visual disability, you may be able to use a screen reader or other text-to-speech or text-to-Braille tool to review the contents of this Privacy Policy.
From whom do we collect personal data
This Privacy Policy applies to Company's collection, use, and disclosure of the Personal Data of the following categories of individuals:
Website Visitors
: individuals who visit our Websites and who may volunteer certain contact data (such as their email address) to receive communications from Company.
Customers
: those who register on their own or on behalf of an entity or organization to use any product(s) or service(s) within Company's Platform, including administrators of a Company account.
End Users
: individuals who visit our Customers' websites and whose Personal Data we process (on behalf of our Customers) in order to provide the Services to our Customers pursuant to our agreements with them.
Types of data collected and purposes
Depending on your interaction with us, we may collect two types of data from you:
“
Non-Personal Data
” meaning aggregated, non-personal non-identifiable data, which may be made available or gathered via your access to and use of the Platform. We are not aware of the identity of the user from which the Non-Personal Data is collected. Such Non-Personal Data may include aggregated usage information and technical information transmitted by your device, such as browser version, operating system type and version, mobile network information, device settings, and software data.
“
Personal Data
” (as defined under the GDPR) or “
Personal Information
” (as defined under various US Privacy Laws) meaning data that identifies an individual or may, with reasonable effort, be used to identify an individual.
For the avoidance of doubt, any Non-Personal Data connected or linked to any Personal Data shall be deemed as Personal Data as long as such connection or linkage exists.
We do not knowingly collect or process any Personal Data constituting or revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership, genetic data, biometric data, data concerning a person's health, government identifiers, precise geolocation or data concerning a person's sex life or sexual orientation (“
Special Categories of Personal Data
”).
The table below details the types of Personal Data we collect, the methods and purpose of such collection, and our lawful basis for processing such Personal Data (where the GDPR applies):
DATA TYPE
METHODS AND PURPOSE
LAWFUL BASIS
Contact Information
We ask for and collect our Customers, contact data (such as name and email address) as well as our Website Visitors and End Users' contact details when they submit web forms on our Website (“
Contact Information
”).
We process Contact Information to provide you with opportunities and to allow you to receive email communications from us.
We may also ask you to submit such Personal Data if you choose to use interactive features of the Services, including participation in surveys, requesting customer support, or otherwise communicating with us. We will send such communications in accordance with applicable law.
We process Contact Information subject to your consent. Further processing may be subject to our legitimate interest, for example for internal documentation and improvement of service purposes. We may also process Contact Information for the purpose of performing our contract with the data subject whose data is processed.
Log Files
Just as when you visit and interact with most websites and services delivered via the Internet, we may gather certain information from our Customers, Website Visitors and End Users and store it in log files. This information may include but is not limited to Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, system configuration information, URLs of referring pages, and locale and language preferences.
This also includes certain technical Personal Data that is recorded when you use our Services. This information may include but is not limited to WiFi information, operating system and device information, system configuration information, and other information about traffic to and from our or our Customers' websites. (“
Log Files
”)
We process Log Files to understand how visitors use Company Websites, as well as to measure the effectiveness of our features and content. We further use this data to track conversions from ads and understand the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns, and remarket to people who have taken some action on the website.
In addition, data related to our Websites helps us to better understand our business, analyze our operations, maintain, improve, design, and develop the Services and new products, conduct statistical analysis purposes, to test and improve our offers, and decide how to improve the Services based on the results obtained from this processing.
In addition, we use Log Files data for operational, website functionality, security, fraud prevention, and debugging purposes, and to resolve technical problems.
Data collected from End Users will also be used as part of, and for the purpose of, providing our Services to Customers, who serve as the initial Data Controllers (or Businesses, as defined under various US Privacy Laws).
Where we collect Log Files for analytic, operational and security purposes, we process your data based on (a) your consent, where such data is obtained through the use of tracking technologies (as described below), or (b) our legitimate interest. Our legitimate interest is providing you with our Services, providing monetization services to our Customers, and the performance of analytics, security and fraud detection, and campaign reporting.
Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
We may use cookies and other information-gathering technologies to collect information from Website Visitors.
We also use an analytics technology commonly referred to as “Session replay” which helps us better understand user behavior and make improvements to our Services.
We process such data through our third-party cookies and tracking technologies for analytics.
Where we collect such data for analytics purposes, we process the data based on your consent, which we will obtain through our cookie notice and consent management. You may withdraw consent at any time by using the cookie preference settings.
Customer Account Information
When you register for an account, we collect your email address, name and other contact data. We may also ask you to enter your website domain in order to provide our Services. By voluntarily providing us with such data, you represent that you are the owner of such Personal Data or otherwise have the requisite consent to provide it to us. If you register to our Platform through a social network platform (for example Google), you will provide us access to any information you made available on that platform (depending on your privacy settings) and any additional information that you specifically consent to provide us with. (“
Customer Information
”)
Customer Information is required to identify you as a customer and permit you to access your account(s).
We process Customer Information (a) Subject to your consent, and (b) for the performance of our contract with you.
Payment Information
When Customers sign up for one of our paid Services, they must provide billing information. We do not store full credit card numbers or personal account numbers. The required information depends on the billing method chosen. For example, if you pay with a credit card, our third party payment service providers will collect your card information and billing address.
Payment information is collected by our payment service providers in order to process payments for purchases, fulfill requests for refunds, returns, or exchanges, and process the redemption of discounts.
The legal bases for processing this data are (a) the performance of our contractual obligation, (b) consent, and (c) our legitimate interests. Our legitimate interests in this case are processing of information which is necessary for the provision of our Services.
Legal Matters
We may use certain Personal Data to prevent potentially prohibited or illegal activities, fraud, misappropriation, infringements, identity thefts and any other misuse of the Services, to enforce our legal terms and conditions, to protect the security or integrity of our databases, and to take precautions against legal liability.
Such processing is based on our legitimate interests, which in this case are protecting our Services and data, exercising our legal rights, and complying with our legal obligations.
Please note that the actual processing operation per each purpose of use and lawful basis detailed in the table above may differ. Such processing operation usually includes a set of operations made by automated means, such as collection, storage, use, disclosure by transmission, erasure or destruction. The transfer of Personal Data to third party countries as further detailed in the International Data Transfers Section is based on the same lawful basis as stipulated in the table above.
We may collect different categories of Personal Data and Non-Personal Data from you, depending on the nature of your interaction with the Services, as detailed above.
Cookies and similar technologies
We use “cookies” (or similar tracking technologies) when you access or interact with our Services. The use of cookies is a standard industry-wide practice. A “cookie” is a small piece of information that a website assigns and stores on your computer while you are viewing it. You can find more information about cookies at
All About Cookies
. Cookies can be used for various purposes, including allowing you to navigate between pages efficiently, or for statistical and advertising purposes. To learn more, please visit
EX.CO's Cookie Policy
.
Categories of recipients to whom we disclose personal data
We disclose your Personal Data to third parties that help us maintain and provide our Services. More information about the categories of such third-party recipients is described below:
CATEGORY OF RECIPIENT
DATA THAT WILL BE DISCLOSED
PURPOSE OF DISCLOSURE
Internal concerned parties
All types of Personal Data.
We may disclose your Personal Data to companies within our group, as well as our employees, in order to provide you with and improve our Services.
Service providers
All types of Personal Data.
We may disclose your Personal Data to our service providers, such as payment processors, storage providers (such as AWS), marketing affiliates (who assist us with carrying our marketing campaigns, such as email campaigns), our fraud detection tools, and our analytics providers who help us provide you with our Service.
Legal and regulatory entities
All types of Personal Data, subject to requests by authorities.
We may disclose Personal Data in case we believe, in good faith, that such disclosure is necessary in order to enforce our policies (including our
Company Terms
), take precautions against liabilities, investigate and defend ourselves against any third party claims or allegations, protect the security and integrity of the Services and protect the rights and property of Company. We may also disclose your Personal Data where requested by legal or regulatory authorities having control or jurisdiction over us or you.
Mergers and acquisitions
All types of Personal Data.
We may disclose or transfer your Personal Data if we enter into a business transaction such as a merger, acquisition, reorganization, bankruptcy, or sale of some or all of our assets. Any party that acquires our assets as part of such a transaction will continue to use your data in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Policy.
Professional advisers
All types of Personal Data.
In individual instances, we may disclose Personal Data to professional advisers acting as processors or controllers including lawyers, bankers, auditors, insurers, and accounting services, to the extent we are legally obliged to disclose or have a legitimate interest in disclosing your Personal Data.
We reserve the right to use, disclose or transfer (for business purposes or otherwise) aggregated and processed Non-Personal Data to third parties, including, inter alia, affiliates, for various purposes including commercial use. This Personal Data may be collected, processed and analyzed by us and transferred in a combined, collectively and aggregated manner (i.e., your information is immediately aggregated with other users) to third parties.
When disclosing Personal Data to third parties, they are required to secure the Personal Data they receive and to use that Personal Data only in compliance with all applicable data protection regulations (such service providers may use other Non-Personal Data for their own benefit).
User rights and opt-out options
We acknowledge that different people have different privacy concerns and preferences. Our goal is to be clear about what information we collect so that you can make meaningful choices about how it is used. We allow you to exercise certain choices, rights, and controls in connection with your Personal Data. Depending on your relationship with us, your jurisdiction and the applicable data protection laws that apply to you, you have the right to control and request certain limitations or rights to be executed.
Please note that some rights are only available for residents of certain jurisdictions:
The right to know what Personal Data we collected,
including the categories of Personal Data, the sources from which the Personal Data is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Data, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose Personal Data, and the specific pieces of Personal Data we collected about you.
The right to know what Personal Data we collected,
including the categories of Personal Data, the sources from which the Personal Data is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Data, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose Personal Data, and the specific pieces of Personal Data we collected about you.
The right to delete Personal Data
that we collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
The right to correct inaccurate Personal Data
that we maintain about you.
The right to opt-out of the “sharing” of your Personal Data for “cross-contextual behavioral advertising”
(or as otherwise defined under applicable US Privacy Laws), often referred to as “interest-based advertising” or “targeted advertising”.
The right to opt-out of the “sale”
of your Personal Data
(or as otherwise defined under applicable Us Privacy Laws).
The right to Limit the Use or Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information (“SPI”).
The right to request to opt-out from processing involving profiling
, in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you.
The right to opt-out of the use of automated decision making
in relation to your Personal Data.
The right to not be subject to discriminatory treatment
by a business for the exercise of privacy rights conferred, including an employee's, applicants, or independent contractor's right not to be retaliated against for the exercise of their rights, denying a consumer goods or services, charging different prices or rates for goods or services, providing you a different level or quality of goods or services, etc. We may, however, charge different prices or rates, or provide a different level or quality of goods or services, if that difference is reasonably related to the value provided to us by your Personal Data.
The right to request a copy of your Personal Data
, including, where applicable, to obtain a copy of the Personal Data you provided to us in a portable format.
The right to request restrictions or to object to processing of your Personal Data.
Withdrawal of Consent
- If Personal Data is processed on the basis of your consent, you have the right to withdraw it at any time.
Exercising your rights
Your rights may be exercised by contacting our DPO at
dpo@ex.co
. Certain rights can also be easily executed independently:
You can opt-out from receiving our emails by clicking the “unsubscribe” link available in the email itself.
You can use the
cookie settings tool
on our website (click the bottom-left icon from any page) to change your preferences and to submit requests to opt-out of our “sharing” of your personal information.
You can opt out of interest-based advertising with some of the service providers we use, such as
Google
and
Google Analytics
. Please note that if you opt out of interest-based advertising, some information will still be collected for other purposes such as analytics, and internal operations. You will also continue to receive contextual advertisements, but they may be less relevant to your interests.
You may opt-out directly from third party retargeting cookies or other ad-technology trackers through self-regulatory services. For more information, please visit:
Digital Advertising Alliance
(US)
Digital Advertising Alliance
(Canada)
Digital Advertising Alliance
(EU)
Network Advertising Initiative
Digital Advertising Alliance App Choices
Use the
Global Privacy Control
(“GPC”) signals. Ad choices settings will vary depending on your browser and device settings. Please note that your optout choices will only apply to the specific browser or device from which you opt out. We encourage you to explore your device and browser settings to better understand your choices.
Data retention
We will retain your Personal Data for as long as necessary to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our policies. Please note that except as required by applicable law, we will not be obligated to retain your data for any particular period, and we may delete it for any reason and at any time, without providing you with prior notice if our intention to do so. However, retention periods shall be determined taking into account the type of information that is collected and the purpose for which it is collected for, bearing in mind the requirements applicable to the situation and the need to destroy outdated, unused information at the earliest reasonable time.
Security measures
We work hard to protect the Personal Data we process from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. We have implemented administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to help prevent unauthorized access, use, or disclosure of your Personal Data.
Your account Information is protected by a password for your privacy and security or by an SSO service such as Google of Facebook identity services. You need to help us prevent unauthorized access to your account by protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your account by signing off after you have finished accessing your account. You will be solely responsible for keeping your password confidential and for all use of your password and your account, including any unauthorized use.
While we seek to protect your information to ensure that it is kept confidential, we cannot guarantee the security of any information. You should be aware that there is always some risk involved in transmitting information over the internet and that there is also some risk that others could find a way to thwart our security systems. As a result, while we strive to protect your Personal Data, we cannot ensure or warrant the security and privacy of your Personal Data or other content you transmit using the Platform, and you do so at your own risk. Thus, we encourage you to exercise discretion regarding the Personal Data you choose to disclose.
International data transfers
We operate globally, and any information that we collect, disclose or share, including (but not limited to) your Personal Data, can be stored and processed in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom and United States, for the purposes detailed in this Policy. To the extent that the GDPR or UK GDPR are applicable, we will only transfer or share your Personal Data to data recipients:
located in the EEA or in the UK;
located in non-EEA countries or UK which have been approved as providing adequate level of data protection by the European Committee; or
who have entered into a legal agreement ensuring an adequate level of data protection, including the Standard Contractual Clauses as approved by the European Committee.
Interaction with third-party websites
Our Services enable and host third party content, products or services that are not owned or controlled by us, including sponsored content and advertisement (each or jointly “
Third Party Content
”). Third Party Content hosted on our Services is provided directly by its owners or operators and governed by their own terms and privacy policies. Although we do require each Third Party Content to ensure full compliance and transparency, we are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of such Third Party Content. Please be aware that Third Party Content and related services may collect Personal Data from you based on
your consent
, including through use of cookies, as further detailed above.
Eligibility and children privacy
Our Services are not intended for use by individuals under the age of majority, as defined by the applicable law in such individual's jurisdiction of residence (“
Minor
”). Company does not knowingly process Minor's information and will discard any data we receive from a user that we find or reasonably suspect to be a Minor immediately upon discovery. Please contact us at:
dpo@ex.co
if you have reason to believe that a Minor has shared any data with us.
Additional Information for US Residents
This Section supplements the Privacy Policy and addresses specific disclosure requirements under US Privacy Laws.
[1]
Collection, disclosure and sharing of Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have collected the following Personal Information:
Category of Personal Information Collected
Personal Information Collected
Sources of Personal Information
Business Purpose for Collection
Identifiers
Full name, email address, postal address, social media identifier, IP address, account name
Directly from consumers upon subscription. Directly or indirectly from activity on our Websites by cookies or other tracking technologies. From third parties that interact with us, including social networks and other publicly available sources.
To provide you with our Services.
To improve our Services.
To detect and prevent fraud or illegal activities.
To respond to your requests and inquiries, and communicate with you.
Direct marketing purposes – we may use the contact details you provided us to send you promotional offers.
To perform research, technical diagnostics, analytics or statistical purposes.
Information is also disclosed to business partners for commercial purposes (e.g. to advertisers).
To charge our Customers for the Services provided by us.
Personal Information Categories listed in the California Customer Records Statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
Name, image, address.
Internet or Other Electronic Network Activity Information
The referring page that linked to Company Websites, browsing history, interaction with Company Websites.
Directly from consumer's device by using cookies or other tracking technologies.
Geolocation Data
Country, State and city.
Directly from consumer's device by using IP address, or as directly submitted by the consumer, or as made available on publicly available sources.
Professional or employment-related information
Company name, roles of relevant Customer employees.
Directly from correspondence with users. From Customer's website, social media page or other publicly available resources.
Commercial Information
Records of products or Services purchased by us.
From our databases of historical transactions.
We do not “Sell” Personal Information.
We may “Share” Personal Information about you (in the meaning assigned to the terms "Sell" and "Share" under US Privacy Laws).
In the preceding twelve (12) months we disclosed or shared your Personal Information, as described below:
Categories of Recipients
Type of Personal Information
Disclosed/Shared?
Purpose
Business partners, such as customers and advertisers
Unique identifiers, IP address, user activity data (interaction with Ads)
Shared
Company's operational purposes. The disclosure of such Personal Information will be as reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve such operational purposes. This includes:
Auditing related to a current interaction with our Consumers.
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for that activity.
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair our Services.
Short-term, transient use, provided the personal information that is not disclosed to another third party and is not used to build a profile about a consumer or otherwise alter an individual consumer's experience outside the current interaction, including, but not limited to, the contextual customization of ads shown as part of the same interaction.
Performing services on behalf of another business or Service Provider.
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration.
Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of our Services, and to improve, upgrade, or enhance our Services.
Affiliates
All types of Personal Information
Disclosed
Service Providers
All types of Personal Information
Disclosed
Authorized agents
“Authorized agents” may submit opt out requests on a consumer's behalf. If you have elected to use an authorized agent, or if you are an authorized agent who would like to submit requests on behalf of a consumer, the following procedures will be required prior to acceptance of any requests by an authorized agent on behalf of a consumer. Usually, we will accept requests from qualified third parties on behalf of other consumers, regardless of either the consumer or the authorized agent's state of residence, provided that the third party successfully completes the following qualification procedures:
When a consumer uses an authorized agent to submit a request to know or a request to delete, a business may require that the consumer do the following:
Provide the authorized agent signed permission to do so or power of attorney.
Verify their own identity directly with the business.
Directly confirm with the business that they provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
We may deny a request from an authorized agent that does not submit proof that they have been authorized by the consumer to act on their behalf.
Notice of financial incentive
We do not offer financial incentives to consumers for providing Personal Information.
Other California obligations:
Direct Marketing Requests:
California Civil Code Section 1798.83 permits you, if you are a California resident, to request certain information regarding disclosure of Personal Information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, please contact us at
dpo@ex.co
“Do Not Track” Settings:
Cal. Bus. And Prof. Code Section 22575 also requires us to notify you how we deal with the “Do Not Track” settings in your browser. As of the effective date listed above, there is no commonly accepted response for Do Not Track signals initiated by browsers. Therefore, we so not respond to the Do Not Track settings. Do Not Track is a privacy preference you can set in your web browser to indicate that you do not want certain information about your web page visits tracked and collected across websites. For more details, including how to turn on Do Not Track, visit:
www.donottrack.us
.
Additional disclosures for Nevada residents
Nevada law requires certain businesses to establish a designated request address where Nevada consumers may submit requests directing the business not to sell certain kinds of Personal Information that the business has collected or will collect about the consumer. Nevada law defines “sale” as the exchange of Personal Information for monetary consideration by the business to a third party for the third party to license or sell the Personal Information to other third parties. If you are a Nevada consumer from whom Company has collected Personal Information and you wish to submit a request relating to our compliance with Nevada law, please contact us at
dpo@ex.co
.
Policy amendments
The updated date of this Policy will be reflected in the “Last Updated” heading, indicated at the header of the Policy. As required by the CCPA we will review this Privacy Policy every twelve (12) months and amend it as necessary. We recommend you review this Policy periodically to ensure that you understand our most updated privacy practices.
Controlling version
This Policy has been drafted in the English language, which is the original and controlling version of this Policy. All translations of this Policy into other languages shall be solely for convenience and shall not control the meaning or application of this Policy. In the event of any discrepancy between the meanings of any translated versions of the Policy and the English language version, the meaning of the English language version is controlling.
Contact information
If you have any question, inquiry or concern related to this Privacy Policy or the processing of your Personal Data, you may contact our Data Protection Officer, either at
dpo@ex.co
or by postal mail:
EX.CO Technologies Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
5 Aluf Kalman Magen St.
Building A, 1st Floor
Tel Aviv, 6107077
Israel
Data Protection Representative
: The Company has a designated representative in the European Union for data protection matters, pursuant to Article 27 of the GDPR, and in the United Kingdom. Inquiries regarding Company's EU and UK privacy practices may be sent to:
EX.CO Technologies Limited
Attn: Data Protection Representative
3 Waterhouse Square
138-142 Holborn
London EC1N 2SW
United Kingdom
1
California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100 et seq., as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020, and the regulations enacted thereunder, Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act, Va. Civ. Code § 59.1, Colorado Privacy Act, 2021 Colo. ALS 483; 2021 Colo. Ch. 483; 2021 Colo. SB. 190, Connecticut Data Privacy and Online Monitoring Act, Conn. Gen. Stat. §42-515 et. Seq., Utah Consumer Privacy Act, Utah Code Ann. Title 13, Ch. 61, and additional US privacy laws as may be enacted or amended from time to time (collectively:
"US Privacy Laws"
)